Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1217.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102(e) and (z.5) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(e) The words "district register" shall mean the [cards] electronic poll book containing all or any part of the registry list of qualified electors of the same election district, as prepared by the registration commissions.* * *(z.5) The words "proof of identification" shall mean:[(1) In the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a valid-without-photo driver's license or 20250HB1217PN1365 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132333435363738 a valid-without-photo identification card issued by the Department of Transportation.(2) For an elector who appears to vote under section 1210, a document that:(i) shows the name of the individual to whom the document was issued and the name substantially conforms to the name of the individual as it appears in the district register;(ii) shows a photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;(iii) includes an expiration date and is not expired, except:(A) for a document issued by the Department of Transportation which is not more than twelve (12) months past the expiration date; or(B) in the case of a document from an agency of the Armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard which does not designate a specific date on which the document expires, but includes a designation that the expiration date is indefinite; and(iv) was issued by one of the following:(A) The United States Government.(B) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(C) A municipality of this Commonwealth to an employee of that municipality.(D) An accredited Pennsylvania public or private institution of higher learning.(E) A Pennsylvania care facility.(3) For a qualified absentee elector under section 1301 or a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified mail-in elector under section 1301-D:(i) in the case of an elector who has been issued a current and valid driver's license, the elector's driver's license number;(ii) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license, the last four digits of the elector's Social Security number;(iii) in the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (1); or(iv) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license or Social Security number, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (2).](1) In the case of any elector, at least one of the following:(i) the elector's driver's license;(ii) in the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a copy of a valid-without-photo driver's license or a valid-without-photo identification card issued by the Department of Transportation;(iii) the elector's voter registration card with scannable identification number and a copy of the elector's signature, as issued by a county under section 302;(iv) a document from an agency of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard which does not designate a specific date on which the document expires, but includes a designation that that expiration date is indefinite;20250HB1217PN1365 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) a document issued by the secretary under section 201(n);(vi) an affidavit provided to an elector by elections officers, on which the elector shall affirm his or her identity, including his or her signature and the last four digits of his or her Social Security number. The affidavit shall include disclosure of the penalties under section 1802; or(vii) a document that shows the name and photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued, includes an expiration date and is not expired and is issued by one of the following:(A) The United States Government.(B) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(C) A municipality of this Commonwealth to an employee of that municipality.(D) An accredited public or private institution of higher learning located in this Commonwealth.(E) A care facility located in this Commonwealth.(2) (Reserved).* * *(z.7) The words "ballot-comparison risk-limiting audit" shall mean a statistical audit that compares the interpretation of individual ballots according to the voting system to a human interpretation of the same individual ballots.(z.8) The words "risk limit" shall mean the maximum chance that an audit will not progress to a full hand recount if the voting system record is incorrect.(z.9) The words "ballot-polling risk-limiting audit" shall mean a statistical audit that selects ballots at random and interprets the ballots by hand until there is strong evidence that the recorded outcome in an election is correct, or until 20250HB1217PN1365 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all the votes have been counted by hand.(z.10) The words "care facility" shall mean any of the following:(1) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the "Health Care Facilities Act."(2) An assisted living residence or a personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."Section 2. Section 107 of the act is repealed:[Section 107. Public Funding of Elections.--(a) The cost and expense to State and local governments relating to the registration of voters and the preparation, administration and conduct of elections in this Commonwealth shall be funded only upon lawful appropriation of the Federal, State and local governments, and the source of funding shall be limited to money derived from taxes, fees and other sources of public revenue.(b) State and local governments, including their public officers, public officials, employees and agents, acting in their official capacity, may not solicit, apply for, enter into a contract for or receive or expend gifts, donations, grants or funding from any individual, business, organization, trust, foundation, or any nongovernmental entity for the registration of voters or the preparation, administration or conducting of an election in this Commonwealth.(c) This section shall not be construed to apply to the collection of fees authorized by law or to the donation or use of:(1) a location for voting purposes;(2) services that are provided without remuneration; or20250HB1217PN1365 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) goods that have a nominal value of less than one hundred ($100) dollars.]Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 108. Legislative Authority Over Elections.--Section 5 of Article I of the Constitution of the United States and Article VII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania vest authority for prescribing election law in the General Assembly.Section 109. Bureau of Election Audits.--(a) The Bureau of Election Audits is established in the Department of the Auditor General. The Bureau of Election Audits shall have subpoena power to request from the department or a county any documents, records, papers, data, ballots, election materials or testimony necessary for the efficient completion of the audits required under this section.(b) The Auditor General shall conduct independent election audits in accordance with generally accepted governmental audit standards and appropriate service organization control standards and shall ensure that the audit methodology will verify the accuracy of the election and the accuracy of election equipment used.(c) For audits that occur during an election year in which the Auditor General stands for election , the Auditor General shall appoint an independent special auditor who shall be a licensed certified public accountant and shall have experience in completing election audits to oversee the operation of the Bureau of Election Audits.(d) The Bureau of Election Audits shall ensure continuous improvement of the election audits required under this section to ensure the accuracy of election results and compliance with Federal and State laws.20250HB1217PN1365 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) The duties of the Bureau of Election Audits shall include:(1) Except if a full manual recount of an election is undertaken or an election is uncontested, to conduct result- confirming audits of each election in this Commonwealth, completed by the third Friday following the election. The audits shall include:(i) A statistically sound, ballot-comparison risk-limiting audit or ballot-polling risk-limiting audit of ballots for an election, as provided under section 1117-A, unless a full manual recount of the election is conducted.(ii) An audit of election machine logs.(iii) An audit of the returned absentee and mail-in ballots in each county, including a comparison of retained envelopes on which the executed declarations appear, for mail-in and absentee ballots, secrecy envelopes and the total number of absentee and mail-in ballots canvassed.(iv) An audit comparing each canvassed and retained paper ballot in each county with the number of votes recorded.(v) An audit of the pre-election testing of election equipment conducted by each county.(vi) Any other audit deemed necessary by the Bureau of Election Audits to ensure public trust in the outcome of each election.(2) To conduct performance audits of the operations of elections systems and processes at least once every five years. The audits shall include:(i) An audit of each county election office in this Commonwealth.(ii) An audit of the Department of State's election 20250HB1217PN1365 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment certification process.(iii) An audit of the Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors system, including an audit of the accuracy of the list of registered electors.(iv) An audit of the Department of State's administration of elections.(v) Any other audit deemed necessary by the Bureau of Election Audits to ensure public trust in the election administration in this Commonwealth.(3) To publicly post audit methodologies for each of the audits required under this section, including on the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website and the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) To publicly post the results of each audit required under this section, including on the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website, the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website and each county's publicly accessible Internet website.(5) To monitor corrective action plans developed by entities audited under this section, ensuring that the corrective action plan addresses deficiencies identified by an audit and that the plan is successfully executed to remediate deficiencies.(f) The duties of the county board of elections shall include:(1) Cooperating with the Bureau of Election Audits to enable efficient conduct of audits required under subsection (d).(2) Cooperating with the Bureau of Election Audits to post the results of audits conducted in that county as required under subsection (e)(4).(3) Holding a public meeting between the third Saturday 20250HB1217PN1365 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after an election and the fourth Thursday after an election, at which the board shall make publicly available to the residents of the county the results of audits conducted under subsection (d).(4) Submitting to the Department of State, along with the certified results of the election, a report with the results of the audits conducted under subsection (e)(3). The report shall include the following:(i) The overall accuracy of election results as confirmed by the audits under subsection (e)(3).(ii) A description of any problem or discrepancies encountered in the administration of the election.(iii) The identified causes of any problems or discrepancies.(5) Submitting to the Department of State, within ninety (90) days after any election, recommended corrective actions with respect to avoiding or mitigating any problems or discrepancies in future elections.(6) Developing a corrective action plan to address any findings of error or deficiency within an audit conducted under this section.(g) The duties of the Department of State shall include:(1) Cooperating with the Bureau of Election Audits to enable efficient conduct of each audit required under subsection (e).(2) Cooperating with the Bureau of Election Audits to post the methodologies and results of audits conducted in this Commonwealth as required under subsection (e)(3) and (4).(3) To develop a corrective action plan to address any findings of error or deficiency within an audit conducted under this section.20250HB1217PN1365 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 110. Special Standing in Challenges to the Election Code.--(a) In a judicial proceeding in which all or part of this act is alleged to be unconstitutional, either or both chambers of the General Assembly, subject to subsection (b), shall have special standing to intervene as a party in the action and to defend the act.(b) The following shall apply:(1) Special standing to intervene as a party under subsection (a) for the Senate shall require an action of the Senate Subcommittee on Management Operation as provided under section 2.1 of the act of January 10, 1968 (1967 P.L.925, No.417), referred to as the "Legislative Officers and Employes Law."(2) Special standing to intervene as a party under subsection (a) for the House of Representatives shall require a majority vote by the House of Representatives.(c) Intervention by either or both chambers of the General Assembly under this section shall not constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity, legislative privilege or other privilege or immunity.(d) This section shall not make either or both chambers of the General Assembly a necessary or indispensable party to an action. A party to an action may not name either or both chambers of the General Assembly as a party or move to join either or both chambers of the General Assembly as a party based on this section.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the standing of either or both chambers or an individual member of the General Assembly in a judicial proceeding in which the subject matter relates to specific powers unique to a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legislator's functions under the Constitution of Pennsylvania being diminished or impaired.Section 4. Section 201(f), (f.1) and (g) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 201. Powers and Duties of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall exercise in the manner provided by this act all powers granted to him by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon him by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(f) To receive from county boards of elections the returns of primaries and elections, to canvass and compute the votes cast for candidates and upon questions as required by the provisions of this act; to proclaim the results of such primaries and elections within three days after receipt of returns from all counties, and to issue certificates of election to the successful candidates at such elections, except in cases where that duty is imposed by law on another officer or board.[(f.1) To develop a voluntary professional certification and poll worker training program for county election officials in consultation with county boards of elections.]* * *(g) To perform only such other duties relating to elections as [may be prescribed by law.] authorized by this act or by 25 Pa.C.S. (relating to elections). Any actions or duties relating to elections not explicitly authorized by this act or by 25 Pa.C.S. are prohibited.* * *(i) To obtain and maintain uniformity in the interpretation 20250HB1217PN1365 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and implementation of election laws.(j) To provide uniform standards for the proper, accurate and uniform implementation of voter registration laws and records.(k) To actively seek out and collect the data and statistics necessary to knowledgeably scrutinize the effectiveness of election laws.(l) To provide technical assistance to election directors.(m) To maintain a hotline for the reporting of any known or suspected election fraud or intimidation or duress of poll workers, judges of elections, election officials or election observers, and to provide election fraud education to the public.(n) To provide to any registered elector upon request, and free of charge, a durable photo identification card which may be used for the purposes of voting.(o) To transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by December 31 of each odd-numbered year the official instructions and procedures manual prescribed by the Pennsylvania Election Law Advisory Board.(p) To receive any private donations intended to contribute to election administration or voter education in this Commonwealth, and to distribute the funds, or any public funds used for the purposes of voter education, equally across this Commonwealth based upon the most recent census estimate of citizen voting age population. A distribution of private funds must be approved by the Pennsylvania Election Law Advisory Board.(q) To maintain a publicly accessible Internet website using 20250HB1217PN1365 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a .gov domain name, on which the secretary shall post information required by this act. The website shall additionally adhere to generally accepted accessibility standards, including compatibility with screen reading software.(r) To retain and make publicly available any communications relating to election administration and sent between the department and at least three county election directors.(s) To develop a uniform application for registered electors to update their signature of record or to provide a medical doctor's assessment of signature inconsistency due to a medical condition.(t) To cooperate with an independent prosecutor appointed by the Attorney General for each election cycle to review election complaints received by the secretary and the county boards of elections.(u) To publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website the list of registered electors in each county and Statewide, at least five days prior to an election.(v) To reimburse counties for the cost of annual training required under section 1302-E.(w) To create and publish, prior to the proclamation of results in a primary or election, a combined record of the registered electors in this Commonwealth as of the date of the primary or election, together with the record of participation in the primary or election by each registered elector, submitted by counties under this act. The record shall be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, made available upon request to any elector and retained for a period of five years. A physical copy of the record required under this subsection must be created, dated and retained for a period of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 five years.(x) In addition to the requirements of 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 15 (relating to changes in records), to seek a record of all deaths among residents of this Commonwealth, and each month to compare the records with the list of electors in the Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors, and for any elector found to be deceased, to notify the elector's county of residence.(y) In addition to the requirements of 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 15, to fully participate in the Electronic Registration Information Center and to utilize all available information received through that system and through the National Change of Address Program of the United States Postal Service to ensure the accuracy of the Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors and the continued eligibility of all registered electors in this Commonwealth.(z) To receive from counties a monthly report of any newly registered elector who was previously registered in another state and to notify the chief elections administrator in that state of the elector's registration in this Commonwealth.(z.1) To create and maintain a tracking system for each qualified mail-in or absentee elector to track the status of an application for a mail-in or absentee ballot, the date on which an elector's ballot is prepared, the date on which an elector's ballot is mailed, the date on which an elector's ballot is received and the date on which an elector's ballot is pre-canvassed or canvassed.(z.2) To develop and offer the training prescribed by the Election Law Advisory Board under section 1302-E, and to make such training available free of charge to any individual required to complete the training.Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:20250HB1217PN1365 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 209. Reports on Implementation of Elections.--(a) No later than 75 days after an election, the Bureau of Commissions, Elections and Legislation of the Department of State shall issue a report to the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives. A copy of the report shall also be made available on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) The report under subsection (a) shall include only the following information relating to the administration of the election by the Department of State, a county board of elections or a registration commission established under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1203(a) (relating to commissions):(1) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of applications for an absentee ballot which were received by the county board of elections.(2) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of applications for a mail-in ballot which were received by the county board of elections.(3) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of applications for an absentee ballot which were approved by the county board of elections.(4) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of applications for a mail-in ballot which were approved by the county board of elections.(5) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of absentee ballots which were voted by qualified electors.(6) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 number of mail-in ballots which were voted by qualified electors.(7) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of provisional ballots cast under section 1210(a.4).(8) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of qualified electors voting by a provisional ballot under section 1306(b)(2).(9) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of qualified electors voting by provisional ballot under section 1306-D(b)(2).(10) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of provisional ballots under paragraph (7) which were canvassed.(11) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of provisional ballots under paragraph (8) which were canvassed.(12) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of provisional ballots under paragraph (9) which were canvassed.(13) (Reserved). (14) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of polling places in school buildings.(15) For each county, the date, starting time and ending time that the county board of elections met to pre-canvass absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under section 1308(g)(1.1).(16) For each county, the date, starting time and ending time that the county board of elections met to canvass absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under section 1308(g)(2).(17) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of absentee ballots which were challenged under section 20250HB1217PN1365 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1302.2(c).(18) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of mail-in ballots which were challenged under this act.(19) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of absentee ballots subject to challenges under paragraph (17) which were not canvassed.(20) For each county and the sum for this Commonwealth, the number of mail-in ballots subject to challenges under paragraph (18) which were not canvassed.(21) The number of incidents known to the Department of State, county boards of elections or registration commissions relating to each of the following categories:(i) An absentee ballot or mail-in ballot which was sent to the wrong individual or wrong address.(ii) An absentee ballot or mail-in ballot which was voted by an individual other than the individual who applied for the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot.(iii) An absentee ballot or mail-in ballot which was returned to the county board of elections by a means other than permitted by law.(22) To the extent consistent with Federal and State law, a review of any action taken by the Department of State, county board of elections or registration commissions in response to an incident under paragraph (21), including determinations made on the incident, legal actions filed and referrals to law enforcement.(23) A review of issues or incidents encountered with an electronic voting system that received the approval of the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1105-A, including technical issues encountered at polling places.20250HB1217PN1365 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) The Department of State shall develop a process to collect data required to be included in the report under subsection (b) from each county board of elections which conducts an election and each registration commission under 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration) in a county which conducts an election, as applicable. A county board of elections or registration commission under this subsection shall comply with the process for submission of data under this subsection no later than 60 days after an election. Section 6. Section 302(f), (k) and (m) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(f) [To make and issue such rules, regulations and instructions, not inconsistent with law, as they may deem necessary for the guidance of voting machine custodians, elections officers and electors.] To follow and obey rules, regulations and instructions as are included for each election in the manual of operations published under section 201. Any actions or duties relating to elections not explicitly authorized by this act or by 25 Pa.C.S. (relating to elections) or by the manual of operations published under section 201 are prohibited.* * *(k) To receive from district election officers the returns 20250HB1217PN1365 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of all primaries and elections, to canvass and compute the same, and to certify, no later than the [third Monday] fourth Fr iday following the primary or election, the results thereof to the Secretary of the Commonwealth, as may be provided by law, and to such other authorities as may be provided by law. The certification shall include the number of votes received in each election district by each candidate for the General Assembly[.] and a complete record of each registered elector in the county on the date of the election, including which registered electors are recorded as participating in that election and the article of this act under which each elector voted.* * *(m) To prepare and submit, [not later than five days prior to] within twenty days after the last day to register to vote in each primary, municipal and general election, a report to the Secretary of the Commonwealth in the form prescribed by him, which shall contain a statement of the total number of electors registered in each election district, together with a breakdown of registration by each political party or other designation. Copies of said statement shall be furnished, upon request, to the county chairman of each political party and political body[.] and shall be posted to the county board of election's publicly accessible Internet website. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall forthwith submit such information to the Legislative Data Processing Center and shall publicly report the total number of registered electors for each political party or other designation in each county [prior to election day.] not later than five days prior to the primary, municipal or general election.* * *20250HB1217PN1365 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (q) To maintain a publicly accessible Internet website using a .gov domain name. The website shall additionally adhere to generally accepted accessibility standards, including compatibility with screen reading software.(r) To decline to accept any private donation or contribution for the purposes of operating elections, employing staff or selecting and equipping a polling place or for use in voter education, unless received from the secretary under a distribution provided for in section 201(p) . (s) To provide to each registered elector in a county, within one year of the effective date of this subsection and upon new or updated registration after the effective date of this subsection, or at the request of an elector, a durable voter registration card, including a scannable identification code and a likeness of a registered elector's signature. A county board of elections shall investigate the circumstances of any registration card returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service. The investigation shall include contacting the applicant, further attempts to have his or her registration card delivered and the correction or reconsideration of his or her registration status and registered address, if they are found to be incorrect.(t) To capture and store signatures submitted by an elector for use in matching an elector's signature under the requirements of this act.(u) To implement the minimum voter education standards established under section 1302-E and to conduct additional nonpartisan education efforts as necessary to ensure that electors have a working knowledge of the voting process.(v) To report to the Pennsylvania Election Law Advisory 20250HB1217PN1365 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Board, by December 31 of each general election year, a detailed description of the voter education programs implemented and any other information that may be useful in evaluating the effectiveness of voter education.(w) To purchase electronic poll books for use as the district register in each election district within one year after the effective date of this subsection. The electronic poll books must provide an elector with the ability to scan his or her driver's license or his or her voter registration card in order to have his or her eligibility to vote verified, and must have a means for an elector to electronically record his or her signature. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, for elections held within one year of the effective date of this subsection, paper district register cards may still be utilized by any county. After the purchase of electronic poll books, paper district register cards may be retained for use in the event of an unforeseen issue in using electronic poll books at an election.(x) To provide each election district with at least one accessible voting machine approved by the secretary under this act.(y) To publish at each polling place the voter's bill of rights, senior voter's bill of rights and disabled voter's bill of rights established by this act.(z) To provide copies of the voter's bill of rights, senior voter's bill of rights and disabled voter's bill of rights during the process of supervised voting established by this act.(z.1) To review any polling place where voters waited longer than 30 minutes to cast a ballot and to identify and enact plans to alleviate any such waiting time for future elections.20250HB1217PN1365 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (z.2) For counties with a population of fewer than 100,000 at the time of the most recent Federal decennial census, to collaborate with other counties to share resources or property required for the administration of voting by absentee and mail-in electors. The collaboration is not required and participation in any resource sharing shall be at the discretion of each county board.(z.3) In addition to the requirements of 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 15 (relating to changes in records), to seek a record of all deaths among residents of the county and each month to compare the records with the list of registered electors in the county. A registered elector whose first and last name, date of birth and last four digits of the elector's Social Security number are found on a death record shall be subject to immediate removal from the Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors. The local commission shall notify the elector by mail of its action.(z.4) To enter into an agreement with the Unified Judicial System of Pennsylvania to receive a record of any county resident who claims ineligibility for service as a juror under 42 Pa.C.S. § 4502 (relating to qualifications of jurors) and to investigate the registration status of any registered elector who claimed ineligibility to serve as a juror on the basis of a lack of citizenship.(z.5) To cooperate with the Department of State to any degree necessary in the creation of the system required under section 201(z.1).(z.6) To cooperate with the election integrity officer appointed in the county under section 1779, and to include the election integrity officer in all correspondence related to the conduct of the election.20250HB1217PN1365 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (z.7) As follows:(1) To pre-canvass or canvass all mail-in and absentee ballots received prior to election day by no later than nine o' clock P. M. on election day.(2) To canvass all mail-in and absentee ballots received on election day and prior to eight o'clock P. M. by no later than two o'clock A. M. on the day following the election.(3) To compute all returns from each precinct, with the exception of provisional ballots, and all canvassed mail-in or absentee ballots, with the exception of ballots set aside for a determination of compliance with this act, by no later than six o'clock A. M. on the day following the election.(4) A county may receive no reimbursements under this act for an election in which the deadlines under this subsection are not met.(5) Ballots returned by qualified absentee military or overseas electors shall not be subject to the deadlines in this subsection.Section 7. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 313. County Boards of Elections and Satellite Offices.--In addition to the permanent offices operated by any county board of elections, the board may, as necessary, establish additional satellite election offices if the satellite election office established under this section complies with the following requirements:(a) A satellite election office must meet the requirements for and be subject to the same restrictions as a polling place under this act.(b) A satellite election office must offer the same services and capabilities as the permanent offices maintained by the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county board of elections.(c) A satellite election office must be operated by paid staff of the county board of elections.(d) A board establishing satellite election offices must ensure that the locations of the offices are geographically distributed across the county.(e) A satellite election office must be established within a permanent building. For purposes of this section, a permanent building is any existing structure not temporarily erected for use as a satellite election office.(f) The location and hours of operation of a satellite election office shall be published under section 106 at least 30 days prior to its establishment.(g) After the establishment of in-person early voting under Article XIII-F, a satellite election office may only be established at the same premises as early voting locations in a county.Section 8. Sections 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 409, 410, 411, 412.2, 417(b), 526, 527 and 528 of the act are amended to read:Section 401. District Election Boards; Election.--(a) All primaries and elections shall be conducted in each election district by a district election board consisting of a judge of election, a majority inspector of election and a minority inspector of election, assisted by two clerks and machine inspectors [in certain cases, as hereinafter provided] as provided in this act. The judge and inspectors of election of each election district shall be elected [by the electors thereof] at the municipal election[,] and shall hold office for a term of four years from the first Monday of January next 20250HB1217PN1365 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 succeeding [their] the election. Each elector may vote for one [person] individual as judge and for one [person] individual as inspector[, and the person]. The individual receiving the highest number of votes for judge shall be declared elected judge of election, the [person] individual receiving the highest number of votes for inspector shall be declared elected majority inspector of election[, and the person] and the individual receiving the second highest number of votes for inspector shall be declared elected minority inspector of election.(b) The county board shall fill all vacancies in conjunction with the county parties. All vacancies must be filled two months prior to a general election and one month prior to special elections, midterm elections and primaries.(c) The county board shall submit a status report to the Department of State at the beginning of each month notifying the Department of State of the number of vacancies.(d) The county board and county parties shall be provided money to advertise the vacancies and recruit new election day workers. Advertising may include television, radio and social media.(e) Each county board shall place information about county board vacancies on the board's publicly accessible Internet websites and shall produce public service announcements to recruit workers.(f) The county board and parties shall meet each month for progress updates.Section 402. Qualifications of Election Officers.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), election officers shall be qualified registered electors of the [district in which they] county in which the election officers are elected or appointed. 20250HB1217PN1365 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [No person shall be qualified to] No individual shall be qualified to run or serve as an election officer who [shall hold, or shall within two months have held,] holds or in the previous two months has held any office, appointment or employment in or under the Government of the United States or of this [State] Commonwealth or of any city or county or poor district, of any municipal board, commission or trust in any city, [save only district justices] except magisterial district judges, notaries public and persons in the militia service of the [State; nor shall any] Commonwealth. An election officer shall not be eligible to any civil office [to be] voted for at a primary or election at which [he shall serve] the election officer serves, except that of an election officer.(b) The county board may appoint students, notwithstanding [their] the student's eligibility to vote, to serve as a clerk or machine inspector [pursuant to the following]. The following shall apply:(1) The county board may not appoint [no] more than two students per precinct.(2) [The] A judge of elections shall have direct supervision of the student.(3) The county board may compensate the student.(4) The county board shall comply with all applicable Federal and State laws.(5) The student must at the time of the election for which the student shall serve:(i) be at least [seventeen (17)] 17 years of age;(ii) be a United States citizen and a resident of the county in which [he] the student was appointed to serve;(iii) be enrolled in a secondary educational institution 20250HB1217PN1365 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with an exemplary academic record as determined by the educational institution;(iv) be approved by the principal or director of the secondary educational institution; and(v) have obtained the consent of [their] the student's parent or guardian.(6) The student may not serve as a judge of election or [majority or minority] inspector.Section 403. Tie Votes for Judge and Inspector.--If at any municipal election in any district there [shall be] is a tie vote for the office of judge of election, the majority inspector of election [elected at said election] shall decide the tie vote. If at any municipal election in any district there is a tie vote for inspectors, the two candidates who receive the same number of votes shall determine by lot which of [them] the candidate's shall be the majority inspector.[, and the other candidate shall be the minority inspector, and in case of a tie vote also for judge of election at said election, the tie shall be decided by the person so determined to be majority inspector. The county board shall be notified immediately upon the determination of any such tie vote.]Section 404. Clerks of Election, Machine Inspectors.--[Prior to the opening of the polls at each primary and election in districts in which voting machines are not used, each] Each inspector shall appoint one clerk to serve at [such] a primary or election. [One clerk shall be appointed by the minority inspector in each district in which a voting machine or machines are used, and in each district in which more than one voting machine is used, the] The county board of elections shall, prior to each primary [and] or election, appoint for [each additional 20250HB1217PN1365 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voting machine to be used in such] every two voting machines in each district, one qualified registered elector of the county to serve as machine inspector [therein for such primary or election]. The qualifications of clerks and machine inspectors shall be the same as [herein] those provided for election officers.Section 405. Vacancies in Election Boards; Appointment; Judge and Majority Inspector to Be Members of Majority Party; Minority Inspector to Be Member of Minority Party.--(a) Vacancies in election boards existing by reason of the disqualification, removal, resignation or death of an election officer, or from any other cause, occurring prior to the fifth day before any primary or election, shall[, in all cases,] be filled by appointment[, by the court of the proper county of competent persons, qualified in accordance with the provisions of this act, who ] by the county board of elections, in consultation with the county parties, and the appointed individual shall serve for the unexpired term of the [person] individual whose place [he] the appointed individual is appointed to fill[: Provided, however, That any]. A district election officer who, after [his] election or appointment, changes [his] political affiliation, [shall not thereby become] is not disqualified to serve on [said] the election board, and [shall not thereby] may not be subject to removal. In making [such] appointments, the [court] county board shall receive and consider any petitions filed by qualified electors of the district affected[, and shall make no] and may not make an appointment to fill any vacancy unless notice of the time at which [they will make such appointment shall have been posted on the polling place of such district, and in the immediate 20250HB1217PN1365 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vicinity thereof, at least five days prior thereto.] the board will make the appointment was posted in the district polling place at least five days prior to the appointment. In the appointment of inspectors in any election district, both shall not be of the same political party at the time of [said] appointment, but one shall be of the party having the largest number of votes and the other shall be of the party having the second largest number of votes in [said] the district at the last preceding November election, as [nearly as the judge or judges can ascertain the fact] determined by the county board. The judge of election shall, in all cases of appointment, be of the political party having the majority of votes in [said] the district at the last preceding November election, as [nearly as the judge or judges can ascertain the fact. Immediately upon the entry of an order of court filling any vacancy on an election board, the clerk of said court shall forthwith transmit a certified copy of said order to the county board, giving the name and address of said appointee] determined by the county board. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, in counties which have adopted home rule charters or optional plans and which appoint the members of the county election board under section 301(b), vacancies in the county board of elections shall be filled consistent with the provisions for appointment of county election board members under [that] section 301.(a.1) Vacancies in county boards existing by reason of the disqualification, removal, resignation or death of a clerk or machine inspector appointed [pursuant to] under section 404 or a vacancy of a clerk or machine inspector from any other cause occurring prior to the day of any primary or election may be filled by a student [pursuant to] under section 402(b).20250HB1217PN1365 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) The first election board for any new district shall be selected, by the court of the proper county, of competent [persons] individuals, qualified in accordance with the provisions of this act, who shall serve until the next municipal election at which all election officials are elected under the provisions of section 401.(c) Vacancies in election boards occurring at any time during the five days immediately preceding any primary or election or on the day of the primary or election may be filled by appointment by the county board [of elections] from a pool of competent [persons] individuals who are qualified registered electors of the county and who have been trained by the county to perform the duties of election officers [which are required by] required under this act. [Any person] An individual appointed to fill a vacancy in accordance with this subsection shall serve as a member of the election board on the day of the primary or election only. Any election board position filled in accordance with this subsection shall be deemed vacant on the day immediately following the primary or election and subsequently shall be filled in accordance with subsection (a).Section 406. Election Officers to Be Sworn.--All judges, inspectors, clerks of election and machine inspectors shall, before entering upon [their] duties at any primary or election, [be duly sworn in the presence of each other and of the watchers and overseers, if any. The judge shall first be sworn by the minority inspector or by a magistrate, alderman or justice of the peace, and the inspectors, clerks and machine inspectors shall then be sworn by the judge. Each of them shall forthwith sign in duplicate the oath taken by him upon forms to be furnished by the county board, and the same shall be attested by 20250HB1217PN1365 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the officer who administered the oath.] sign a written oath of office which the judges shall transmit to the county board of elections after the polling place closes. The Department of State shall promulgate the text of the written oath for all judges, inspectors, clerks and machine operators.[Section 407. Oath of Judge of Election.--The following shall be the oath of each judge of election:"I (John Doe) do swear (or affirm) that I will as judge duly attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, and in cooperation with the inspectors, faithfully carry on the same; that I will not give my consent to the admission of any person to vote, except such as I firmly believe to be registered and entitled to vote at such election (or primary), according to the provisions of the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth, and that I will use my best endeavors to prevent any fraud, deceit or abuse in carrying on the same, and that I will make a true and perfect return of the said election (or primary), and will at all times impartially and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same, to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 408. Oaths of Inspectors of Election.--The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each inspector:"I (John Doe) do swear (or affirm) that I will as an inspector duly attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, and that I will not admit any person to vote, except such as I shall firmly believe to be registered and entitled to vote at such election (or primary), according to the provisions of the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth, 20250HB1217PN1365 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that I will not vexatiously delay or refuse to permit any person to vote whom I shall believe to be entitled to vote as aforesaid, that I will make a true and perfect return of the said election (or primary), and that I will in all things truly, impartially and faithfully perform my duties therein, to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 409. Oaths of Clerks of Election.--The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each clerk:"I (John Doe) do swear (or affirm) that I will as a clerk attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will carefully and truly record the number of votes that shall be given for each candidate at the election (or primary) as often as his name shall be read to me by the judge or inspectors thereof, and in all things truly and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 410. Oath of Machine Inspectors.--The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each machine inspector:"I (John Doe) do swear (or affirm) that I will as a machine inspector attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will in all things truly and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."20250HB1217PN1365 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 411. Power of Election Officers to Administer Oaths.--The judge and inspectors of election shall each have the power to administer oaths to any person claiming the right to vote, or to his witnesses, or in any matter or thing required to be done or inquired into by them under this act.]Section 412.2. Compensation of District Election Officers.--(a) In all counties regardless of class, judges of election, inspectors of election, clerks and machine operators shall be paid compensation as fixed by the county board of elections for each election, which amount shall be at least [$75] $175 and not more than [$200] $300.(a.1) An election officer shall receive additional compensation, as fixed by the county board of elections, for participating in election training.(a.2) A judge of election shall receive additional compensation, as fixed by the county board of elections, for picking up and returning election materials.(b) If a county board of elections authorizes that the duties of a clerk of elections or machine operator may be performed by two individuals who each perform the duties for one-half of an election day, each individual shall be compensated at one-half of the rate authorized for a single individual who performs the duties for the entire election day.(c) The county board of elections may establish different per diem rates within minimum and maximum rates provided for under subsection (a) based on the number of votes cast for the following groups:(1) 150 votes or fewer.(2) 151 to 300 votes.(3) 301 to 500 votes.20250HB1217PN1365 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) 501 to 750 votes.(5) 751 votes and over.(d) For transmitting returns of elections and the ballot box or boxes, all judges of election shall be entitled to receive the additional sum of $20.(e) The county board of elections may require the minority inspector of election to accompany the judge of election in transmitting the returns of elections, in which case the minority inspector of election shall be entitled to receive the additional sum of $20.(f) The individual furnishing transportation to the judge of election and the minority inspector in transmitting returns and ballot boxes shall be entitled to [a minimum of 35¢] the standard mileage rate set by the Internal Revenue Service for the current year per circular mile from the polling place to the county court house. The name of the individual shall appear on the voucher of the judge of election and only one individual may receive mileage compensation.(h) When a primary and special election or a special election and a general or municipal election take place on the same date, the elections shall be construed as one election for the purpose of receiving compensation.(i) Compensation and other payments received by election officials under this section shall not be deemed income classified and categorized under section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."(j) The Department of State shall reimburse counties for half the cost of payments made under subsections (a) and (f).Section 417. Appointment of Watchers.--* * *20250HB1217PN1365 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Each watcher so appointed must be a qualified registered elector of the county in which the election district for which the watcher was appointed is located and must have completed training required for poll watchers under section 1302-E(c)(7). Each watcher so appointed shall be authorized to serve in the election district for which the watcher was appointed and, when the watcher is not serving in the election district for which the watcher was appointed, in any other election district in the county in which the watcher is a qualified registered elector: Provided, That only one watcher for each candidate at primaries, or for each party or political body at general, municipal or special elections, shall be present in the polling place at any one time from the time that the election officers meet prior to the opening of the polls under section 1208 until the time that the counting of votes is complete and the district register and voting check list is locked and sealed, and all watchers in the room shall remain outside the enclosed space. It shall not be a requirement that a watcher be a resident of the election district for which the watcher is appointed. After the close of the polls and while the ballots are being counted or voting machine canvassed, all the watchers shall be permitted to be in the polling place outside the enclosed space. Each watcher shall be provided with a certificate from the county board of elections, stating his name and the name of the candidate, party or political body he represents. Watchers shall be required to show their certificates when requested to do so. Watchers allowed in the polling place under the provisions of this act, shall be permitted to keep a list of voters and shall be entitled to challenge any person making application to vote and to require proof of his qualifications, as provided by this act. 20250HB1217PN1365 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 During those intervals when voters are not present in the polling place either voting or waiting to vote, the judge of elections shall permit watchers, upon request, to inspect the voting check list and either of the two numbered lists of voters maintained by the county board: Provided, That the watcher shall not mark upon or alter these official election records. The judge of elections shall supervise or delegate the inspection of any requested documents.* * *Section 526. Polling Places to Be Selected by County Board.--(a) The county board of elections shall select and fix the polling place within each new election district and may, at any time[, for any reason that may seem proper to it], but not less than 14 days before an election, either on [its own] board motion or on petition of [ten] 10 qualified registered electors of an election district, change the polling place within any election district. Except in case of an emergency or unavoidable event occurring within [twenty] 14 days of a primary or election, which renders any polling place unavailable for use at [such] a primary or election, the county board shall not change any polling place until at least five days after notice of the proposed change shall have been posted on the existing polling place and in the immediate vicinity [thereof] of the polling place, and until at least five days after written notice of the proposed change shall have been given to the occupant or owner of [said] the polling place, or [their] the owner's agent.(b) Except in case of emergency or unavoidable event, occurring within [twenty] 14 days of a primary or election, which renders any polling place unavailable for use, if a petition [be] is presented to the county board on or before the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 day set for hearing of the petition for change of polling place, signed by a majority of the registered electors of the district, objecting to the proposed change, [said] the change shall not be ordered.(c) The county board of elections shall publicly announce and post on the board's publicly accessible Internet website, not less than [twenty] 14 days prior to the primary election, special election, municipal election or general election, by posting at [its] the board's office in a conspicuous place, a list of the places at which the election is to be held in the various election districts of the county. The list shall be available for public inspection at the office of the county board of elections. The posting on the publicly accessible Internet website shall include the name and contact information of all election officers in the county.Section 527. Public Buildings to Be Used Where Possible; Portable Polling Places.--(a) In selecting polling places, the county board of elections shall, [wherever] if possible and practicable, select schoolhouses, municipal buildings or rooms, or other public buildings for that purpose. Any board of public education or school directors, or county or the municipal authorities shall, upon request of the county board, make arrangements for the use of school property, or of county or municipal property for polling places. In selecting polling places, the county board of elections shall make every effort to select polling places that provide all electors with an environment that is free from intimidation and [violence] accessible to all electors.[In the event no available] If a public building as contemplated under this section is not situated within the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 boundaries of any election district, the county board of elections may, not less than [twenty] 20 days prior to any election, designate as the polling place for [such] the election district any [such public building situated in another election district within the same or immediately adjacent ward, or, if there are no wards, then within the same borough or township as the case may be, provided such other building is located in an election district which is immediately adjacent to the boundary of the election district for which it is to be the polling place and is directly accessible therefrom by public street or thoroughfare.] building that is located in the election district and is accessible to all electors. If no building is available in the election district, a polling place may be identified in a public building within an adjacent election district. If no public building can be identified, a building location in the adjacent election district accessible to all electors may be used. Two or more polling places may be located in the same public building under this section. A polling place may be selected and designated [hereunder less than twenty] less than 20 days prior to any election, with the approval of a court of competent jurisdiction.[(b) In the event no available public building as contemplated under subsection (a) is situated within the boundaries of a borough which constitutes a single election district, the county board of elections may, not less than ten days prior to any election, designate as the polling place for such election district a municipal building owned by that borough and located in an adjoining second class township: Provided, That the municipal building which is to serve as the polling place is located in an election district immediately 20250HB1217PN1365 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adjacent to the boundary of such borough and is directly accessible from the borough by public street or thoroughfare. Such municipal building may be designated as the polling place for an election less than ten days prior to that election, with the approval of a court of competent jurisdiction.](c) The board[, in its discretion,] may procure and provide portable or movable polling places of adequate size and facilities for any or all election districts if no public building or other usable building is available for use.Section 528. Temporary Polling Places.--If, in any election district, no proper polling place can be obtained, the county board of elections shall cause to be constructed for [such] the district, a temporary room of adequate size to be used as a polling place. Moveable polling places and temporary polling places may be used if no public building or other usable building is available for use.Section 9. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VII-AREGISTRATION OF ELECTORSSUBARTICLE APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 700-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who applies to be registered to vote as provided for under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration)."Commission." A registration commission established under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1203 (relating to commissions).20250HB1217PN1365 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Commissioner." A member of a commission."County." A county of this Commonwealth. The term includes a county within which is located a city of the first class or with which a city of the first class is coextensive."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."District." An election district or precinct of a municipality."District register." The list of registered electors prepared by the commission under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1402 (relating to district registers)."Election." A general, special, municipal or primary election."General election." The election which the Constitution of Pennsylvania requires to be held in even-numbered years."General register." The list of registered electors prepared by the commission under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1401 (relating to general register)."Individual in the merchant marine." Any of the following:(1) Individuals employed as officers or members of crews of vessels documented under the law of the United States or of vessels owned by the United States or of vessels of foreign-flag registry under charter to or control of the United States. This paragraph does not include individuals in military service.(2) Individuals enrolled with the United States for employment or for training for employment or maintained by the United States for emergency relief service as officers or members of crews of vessels referred to in paragraph (1). The term does not include individuals in military service or individuals employed or enrolled for employment or for 20250HB1217PN1365 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training for employment or maintained for emergency relief on the Great Lakes or the inland waterways."In military service." Serving in the uniformed services as defined under 37 U.S.C. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Military elector." Any of the following:(1) An individual in military service and the individual's spouse and dependents.(2) An individual in the merchant marine and the individual's spouse and dependents.(3) An individual in a religious or welfare group officially attached to and serving with the armed forces of the United States and the individual's spouse and dependents.(4) An individual who is a civilian employee of the United States outside the territorial limits of the United States, whether or not the individual is subject to the civil service laws and whether or not the individual is paid from funds appropriated by Congress, and the individual's spouse and dependents."Municipal election." The election which the Constitution of Pennsylvania requires to be held in odd-numbered years."Municipality." A city, borough, town or township."Party." Any of the following:(1) A party or political body, one of whose candidates at the general election immediately preceding the primary:(i) polled, in each of at least 10 counties, at least 2% of the largest entire vote cast in the county for any elected candidate; and(ii) polled a total vote in this Commonwealth equal to at least 2% of the largest entire vote cast in this Commonwealth for any elected candidate.20250HB1217PN1365 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A party or political body, one of whose candidates at either the general or municipal election preceding the primary polled at least 5% of the largest entire vote cast for any elected candidate in any county."Political body." A political body not recognized as a political party which has filed proper nomination papers as required by law."Primary election." An election for the nomination of candidates."Qualified elector." An applicant who possesses all of the qualifications for voting prescribed by the Constitution of Pennsylvania and the laws of this Commonwealth or who, being otherwise qualified by continued residence in the election district, obtains such qualifications before the next ensuing election. The term does not include a military elector."Registrant" or "registered elector." A qualified elector who is registered to vote in accordance with this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV."Registration card." A registration record containing all information required on the registration application, including the elector's signature, and suitable space for the insertion by the appropriate official of the following information:(1) The ward and election district of residence.(2) The registrant's street address.(3) Data required to be given upon removal from the registrant's residence.(4) The date of each election at which the registrant votes.(5) The number and letter of the stub of the ballot issued to the registrant or the registrant's number in the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 order of admission to the voting machines.(6) The initials of the election officer who enters the record of voting in the district register.(7) Whether the registrant needs assistance to vote and, if so, the nature of the disability."Registration record." The general register, district register and any other record of registration maintained by a commission. The term includes any record maintained by the commission on the Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors."Secretary." The Secretary of the Commonwealth."Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors" or "SURE system." The integrated voter registration system of all registered electors in this Commonwealth established in 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 12 Subch. B (relating to Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors (SURE)).SUBARTICLE BQUALIFICATIONSSection 701-A. Qualifications to register.(a) Eligibility.--An individual who will be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election, who has been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and who has resided in this Commonwealth and the election district where the individual offers to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next ensuing election shall be eligible to register as provided in this act.(b) Effect.--No individual shall be permitted to vote at any election unless the individual is registered under this subsection, except as provided by law or by order of a court of common pleas. No registered elector shall be required to register again for any election while the elector continues to 20250HB1217PN1365 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reside at the same address.(c) Removal of residence.--Except as otherwise provided under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration), a registered elector who removes residence from one place to another outside the elector's last election district shall not be entitled to vote in the election district of the elector's last residence except under this section and 25 Pa.C.S. §§ 1501(b) (relating to removal notices), 1502 (relating to transfer of registration) and 1902 (relating to procedure for voting following failure to return notification card).Section 702-A. Residence of electors.(a) Circumstances.--(1) For the purpose of registration and voting, no individual shall be deemed to have gained a residence by reason of presence or lost a residence by reason of absence in any of the following circumstances:(i) Being employed in the service, either civil or military, of this Commonwealth or of the United States.(ii) Being engaged in the navigation of the waters of this Commonwealth or of the United States or on the high seas.(iii) Being in an institution at public expense. This subparagraph does not apply to a veteran who resides in a home for disabled and indigent soldiers and sailors maintained by the Commonwealth. Such a veteran may elect to utilize that residence for registration and voting or elect to vote as an absentee elector by the use of an absentee ballot.(2) Nothing under paragraph (1) shall preclude any elector eligible under section 701-A from establishing the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district of residence as the election district of residence under subsection (b).(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no individual who is confined in a penal institution shall be deemed a resident of the election district where the institution is located. The individual shall be deemed to reside where the individual was last registered before being confined in the penal institution, or, if there was no registration prior to confinement, the individual shall be deemed to reside at the last known address before confinement.(4) An individual who resides at a mental health facility, if otherwise qualified under section 701-A, shall be deemed at the individual's option a resident in one of the following:(i) The district where the institution is located.(ii) The district where the individual was last registered to vote before entering the institution. For purposes of this subparagraph, if the individual was not registered before entering the institution, the individual shall be deemed to reside at the last known address before entering the institution.(b) Rules for determination.--(1) A place shall be considered the residence of an individual in which habitation is fixed and to which, whenever the individual is absent, the individual has the intention of returning.(2) An individual shall not be considered to have lost residence if the individual leaves home and goes into another state or another election district for temporary purposes 20250HB1217PN1365 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 only, with the intention of returning.(3) An individual shall not be considered to have gained a residence in an election district if the individual comes into that district for temporary purposes only, without the intention of making that election district a permanent place of abode.(4) If an individual removes to another state with the intention of making that state the permanent residence, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth.(5) If an individual removes to another state with the intention of remaining there an indefinite time and making that state the place of residence, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth, notwithstanding an intention to return at some indefinite future period.(6) If an individual goes into another state and, while there, votes in an election held by that state, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth.(7) An individual employed in the service of the Federal Government or of the Commonwealth and required thereby to be absent from the municipality where the individual resided when entering that employment and the spouse of the individual may remain registered in the district where the individual resided immediately prior to entering that employment, and the individual and the spouse shall be enrolled in the political party designated by the individual or spouse without declaring a residence by street and number as follows:20250HB1217PN1365 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) An individual who registers under this paragraph for Commonwealth employment must produce a certificate from the head of the State agency, under the seal of office, providing that the individual or the individual's spouse is actually employed in the service of the Commonwealth and providing the nature of the employment and the time when the employee first entered the employment. The commission shall retain certificates under this subparagraph.(ii) The commission shall note on the registration record of each individual registered under this paragraph the fact of Federal or State employment.(iii) At least once every two years the commission shall verify the employment of the individuals registered under this paragraph at the proper Federal or State office. If an individual is found to be no longer a Federal or State employee, the individual's registration shall be canceled under 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 15 (relating to changes in records).SUBARTICLE CPROCEDURESection 721-A. Methods of voter registration.An individual qualified to register to vote under section 701-A(a) may apply to register as follows:(1) Under section 722-A.(2) Under section 723-A.(3) Under section 724-A.(4) Under section 725-A.Section 722-A. In-person and online voter registration.(a) In-person application.--Applications may be submitted to 20250HB1217PN1365 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 register to vote or change party enrollment or name or address on a current registration record in person before the commission or a commissioner, a registrar or a clerk at the office of the commission or at a place designated by the commission. The applicant shall be advised that any intentional false statement on the application constitutes perjury and will be punishable as such. The applicant shall provide the information required on the registration application and sign the registration declaration. The commission shall prepare and provide voter registration applications for the purpose of registering qualified electors in accordance with this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration), the commission may use a mail registration application for in-person registration. The commission shall mail the qualified elector an identification card in accordance with section 728-A.(b) Notice.--The commission shall, at least 30 days prior to each establishment's opening, publish under section 106, the address of each place of registration, the address of each office of the commission established for the registration of qualified electors other than its main office and the days and hours when the place or office is open for the registration of qualified electors. The announcement shall be made by posting notice at the place or office and at the commission's main office and by other means as the commission deems advisable.(c) Polls.--The election board of each county shall cause any polling place to be open, in proper order for use, as a place of registration on each day when the polling place is desired by the commission or required by the provisions of this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV for use as a place of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration. The appropriating authority of the county shall provide for the payment of rentals for such polling places and other places of registration.(d) Schools.--The board of public education or the board of school directors shall furnish suitable space in any public school building under its jurisdiction or control and shall cause the space to be open and in proper order for use as a place of registration on each day when the space is desired by the commission for use as a place of registration in accordance with the provisions of this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV. Use under this subsection may not interfere with school instruction.(e) Municipal buildings.--The proper authority in the county or municipality shall furnish suitable space in a building under its jurisdiction or control and shall cause the space to be open and in proper order for use as a place of registration on each day when the space is desired by the commission for use as a place of registration. Use under this subsection may not interfere with the use for which the space is primarily designed.(f) Online application.--(1) An application may be submitted to register to vote or change party enrollment or name or address on a current registration record through an online application developed by the secretary and provided on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The applicant shall provide the information required on the registration application and electronically sign the registration declaration.(2) Except for an application developed under paragraph (1), no other application or third-party interface may be approved or used for the purposes of voter registration.20250HB1217PN1365 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 723-A. Application with driver's license application.(a) Duty to provide simultaneous application.--(1) The Department of Transportation shall provide for simultaneous application for voter registration in conjunction with the process under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510 (relating to issuance and content of driver's license). An application under this subsection shall serve as an application to register to vote unless the applicant fails to sign the voter registration application. The secretary has the primary responsibility for implementing and enforcing the driver's license voter registration system created under this section. The secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, may promulgate regulations for implementing this section.(2) An application for voter registration submitted to the Department of Transportation under this subsection shall be considered as updating any previous voter registration information by a registrant.(3) Any change of address submitted to the Department of Transportation for the purposes of driver licensing shall serve as notification of change of address for voter registration for the registrant involved unless the registrant indicates that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes.(b) Process.--(1) The Department of Transportation shall provide for an application for voter registration as part of a driver's license application.(2) The format of the driver's license/voter registration application shall be determined and prescribed 20250HB1217PN1365 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the secretary and the Secretary of Transportation.(3) The voter registration application portion of the application shall contain all the requirements of an official voter registration application specified in section 727-A. The voter registration portion of the application:(i) may not require any information that duplicates information required in the driver's license portion of the form, other than a second signature; and(ii) may require only the minimum amount of information necessary to prevent duplicate voter registration, to enable the commission to assess the eligibility of the applicant and to administer voter registration and other parts of the election process.(c) Transmission.--(1) The Department of Transportation shall forward completed applications or contents of the completed voter registration applications in machine-readable format to the department by the close of registration for the ensuing election.(2) The department shall transmit the material to the appropriate commission within 10 days after the date of its receipt by the Department of Transportation. If a voter registration application is received by the Department of Transportation within five days before the last day to register before an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate commission not later than five days after the date of its receipt by the Department of Transportation.(3) Upon receipt of the completed voter registration information from the department, the commission shall make a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 record of the date of the receipt of the application and process the application. No applicant shall be deemed eligible to vote until the commission has received and approved the application.(4) After the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system and notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), the Department of Transportation shall transmit electronically the contents of a completed voter registration application within five days of receipt of the application. Upon receipt of the information from the Department of Transportation, a commission shall make a record of the date of the receipt of the application and process the application in accordance with section 728-A. If the commission of the county of residence has not been connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall forward the completed application or contents of the completed application to the department in accordance with paragraph (1). No applicant shall be deemed eligible to vote until the commission has received and approved an application in accordance with section 728-A.(5) Changes of address shall comply with the following:(i) Before the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall notify the department of changes of address received under subsection (a)(3). The department shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's former residence. After the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's former residence. If 20250HB1217PN1365 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the registrant has moved to an address outside this Commonwealth, the commission shall verify the address change in accordance with 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901 (relating to removal of electors). Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), if the registrant confirms in accordance with 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(d) that he or she has moved to another county, the commission shall cancel the registration and forward the registrant's registration information to the commission of the registrant's new county of residence. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), if the registrant has moved to an address within the commission's jurisdiction, the commission shall promptly update the registration record of the registrant in accordance with section 728-A. All changes of address received by the Department of Transportation under this section at least 30 days before an election must be processed by the commission for the ensuing election. For the purpose of this paragraph, the term "registration information" means the registration card and any other record of registration maintained by a commission.(ii) In the case of changes of address received by the Department of Transportation which do not contain a signature of the registrant, the commission receiving the change of address notification shall mail a notice to the registrant at the new residence address requesting verification of the address change. If the change of address is to a new residence outside the commission's jurisdiction, the commission shall mail the following notice:Date.................20250HB1217PN1365 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Office of the Registration Commission.......... County, Pennsylvania....... (Address and Telephone No. of County)We have been notified by the Department of Transportation that you recently changed your address from ................. (old residence address) to ............... (new residence address) and that this change of address is to serve as a change of address for voter registration purposes. Unless you notify this office within 10 days from the date of this notice that this information is not correct, your voter registration will be transferred to ........ County. You may notify this office by writing your residence address, the date and your signature on the bottom of this form and mailing this notice to this office. You need not notify this office if this information is correct.............................Chief ClerkIf the address change is within the commission's jurisdiction, the commission shall mail a voter's identification card to the registrant at the new residence address.(iii) If the registrant does not return the notice under subparagraph (ii) within the 10-day period, the commission shall process the change of address according to subparagraph (i). If the registrant notifies the commission that the information is incorrect and the commission is satisfied with the registrant's explanation of the discrepancy, the address of the registrant's registration shall remain unchanged. If the verification 20250HB1217PN1365 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notification or voter identification card is returned by the post office as undeliverable as addressed or with a forwarding address, the commission shall send a confirmation notice to the registrant's address of former residence in accordance with 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(d)(2).(6) Upon notification and confirmation of any change of address, a commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration record.(d) Prohibition.--An individual who is not a qualified elector is ineligible to register to vote under this section.(e) Effect.--Failure to properly complete a voter registration application shall not affect the validity of an application for a driver's license, a renewal application or an identification card application.(f) Use of information.--No information regarding a declination to register to vote in connection with an application made under this section may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.(g) Staff.--Agents and employees working on behalf of the Department of Transportation assisting in the completion of voter registration applications shall conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the following principles:(1) They shall not seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration or display political preference or party allegiance.(2) They shall not make a statement to an applicant or take an action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote.(3) Applicants wishing to register to vote under this section shall be given the same degree of assistance with the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voter registration application as with all other Department of Transportation forms.Agency employees who violate this subsection shall be removed from employment, provided that the agency at its discretion may impose a penalty of suspension without pay for at least 30 days, but not more than 120 days, if it finds that the violation does not warrant termination.(h) Retention.--The Department of Transportation shall retain complete records of voter registration information received, processed and submitted to the SURE system by the Department of Transportation. The records shall only be for the purpose of supporting audit and accounting controls established to ensure accurate and complete electronic transmission of records between the SURE system and the Department of Transportation.(i) Agreement with department.--The Department of Transportation shall enter into an agreement with the department to match information in the SURE system with information in the database of the Department of Transportation to the extent to verify the accuracy of the driver's license number, identification number or last four digits of the Social Security number provided on an application for voter registration.(j) Agreement with Commissioner of Social Security.--The Department of Transportation shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Security to verify the last four digits of the Social Security number provided in an application for voter registration.Section 724-A. Application by mail.(a) Submission of application.--An application to register to vote or to change party enrollment or name or address on a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current registration may be submitted by voter registration mail application in the manner provided in this section. An application may be submitted by mail or by representative to the commission on an official mail registration application, the form of which shall be determined and prescribed by the secretary or the Federal Election Commission under 52 U.S.C. Ch. 205 (relating to national voter registration). The applicant must complete the information required on the registration application and sign the registration declaration.(b) Time.--Registration under this section may be made at any time. If a registration application is received by a commission beyond the deadline for registration provided in section 1231, the application shall be retained by the commission until the beginning of the next period during which registration can be made.(c) Military electors.--(1) A military elector may apply at any time for registration on an official registration application or any form prescribed by the Federal Government for such purpose.(2) The status of a military elector to register under this section with respect to residence shall remain as the same home residence status from which the military elector is qualified to register. If, at the time of leaving that home address, the military elector had not resided in this Commonwealth or in a particular election district for a sufficient time to have been entitled to be registered but, by continued residence, would have become entitled to be registered, the military elector shall be entitled to be registered at the time the military elector would have been entitled to register had the military elector not left that 20250HB1217PN1365 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 home address but continued to reside there.(3) The commission is authorized to consider a request for an absentee ballot as a request for an official registration application and to forward to the requester all of the following:(i) An absentee ballot and balloting material.(ii) An official registration application.(4) The military elector must complete and file these documents in accordance with the applicable provisions of this act.(5) The right to be registered pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to challenge for any reason other than failure to have furnished the commission a properly completed registration application.Section 725-A. Government agencies.(a) Duty to administer system.--The secretary shall administer a system whereby all offices in this Commonwealth that provide public assistance, each county clerk of orphans' court, including each marriage license bureau, all offices in this Commonwealth that provide State-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities and all armed forces recruitment centers do all of the following:(1) Distribute voter registration applications with each application, reapplication and application for recertification, renewal or change of address.(2) Assist applicants with completion of the registration application unless assistance is refused.(3) Accept completed registration applications.(4) Transmit completed applications to the appropriate commission.20250HB1217PN1365 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Forms.--An agency designated in subsection (a) shall provide a form for office visits or, if the agency provides services to persons with disabilities, for home visits which contains all of the following:(1) The question "If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote today?"(2) If the agency provides public assistance, the statement "Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency."(3) Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or decline to register to vote. In close proximity to the boxes the following words shall appear in prominent type: "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME."(4) The statement "In order to be qualified to register to vote, you must be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election, you must have been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and have resided in Pennsylvania and the election district where you plan to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next election."(5) The statement "If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek help is yours. You may fill out the form in private."(6) The statement "If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to 20250HB1217PN1365 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, Pennsylvania Department of State, Harrisburg, PA 17120." The secretary shall establish and publish a toll-free telephone number for the purpose of receiving complaints.(c) Effect.--Failure to check either box under subsection (b)(3) shall be considered a declination to register to vote.(d) Staff.--Agency employees assisting in the completion of voter registration applications shall conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the following principles:(1) They shall not seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration or display political preference or party allegiance.(2) They shall not make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose of or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote.(3) They shall not make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose of or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.Agency employees who violate this subsection shall be removed from employment, provided that the agency at its discretion may impose a penalty of suspension without pay for at least 30 days, but not more than 120 days, if it finds that the violation does not warrant termination.(e) Encouraging registration.--An agency designated in 20250HB1217PN1365 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a) shall provide reasonable space for nonpartisan signs or posters encouraging voter registration. The signs and posters shall be provided by the secretary.(f) Transmission.--An agency designated in subsection (a) shall forward all completed applications to the appropriate commission within 10 days after the date of receipt. If a voter registration application is received within five days before the last day to register before an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate commission not later than five days after the date of its receipt by the agency.(g) Confidentiality.--The identity of the voter registration agency through which any particular voter is registered in accordance with this section shall not be disclosed to the public.(h) Use of information.--No information relating to a declination to register to vote in connection with an application made at an office described in this section may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.(i) Assistance.--Each agency shall provide to each applicant who chooses to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application form as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms unless the applicant refuses such assistance.(j) Regulation.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations regarding the maintenance and destruction of forms used pursuant to this section.Section 726-A. (Reserved).Section 727-A. Preparation and distribution of applications.(a) Form.--(1) The secretary shall prescribe the form of an 20250HB1217PN1365 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official voter registration application. The official voter registration application shall provide space for the following information about the applicant:(i) Full name.(ii) Address of residence. If the residence is a portion only of the house, the location or number of the room, apartment or floor which is occupied.(iii) Mailing address if different than address of residence.(iv) Name and residence address on previous registration and the year of that registration.(v) Designation of political party, for the purpose of voting at a primary election.(vi) Date of birth.(vii) Telephone number. An application shall not be rejected because of noncompliance with this subparagraph.(viii) Race. An application shall not be rejected because of noncompliance with this subparagraph.(ix) Last four digits of Social Security number. An application without the last four digits of an applicant's Social Security number shall be considered incomplete. An applicant who does not have a Social Security number may have his or her identity confirmed through an alternate record.(x) A Department of Transportation driver's license number or a Department of Transportation identification card number. An application may not be rejected because of noncompliance with this subparagraph.(2) Data required on the voter registration application shall not be more nor less than the minimum data elements 20250HB1217PN1365 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permissible for Federal voter registration.(3) Any person who assists in the completion of the registration application shall sign the application and indicate the person's address. In the case of those registering under sections 723-A and 725-A, the person providing assistance shall insert the person's initials or employee or agent identification number on a separate or detachable portion of the application or computer data file.(4) A voter registration application shall be printed on stock of good quality and shall be of suitable uniform size. Nothing under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration) shall prohibit the design and use of an electronic voter registration application which includes the applicant's digitized or electronic signature. The registration application shall contain the following information; however, the information may be provided on a separate form for voter registration made under section 723-A or 725-A:(i) Notice that a registered elector does not need to reregister unless the registered elector has moved.(ii) Instructions on how to fill out and submit the application and notification of when the application must be submitted to a voter registration office in order to be registered for the ensuing election.(iii) Notice that the applicant must be a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and a resident of this Commonwealth and the election district for at least 30 days and must be at least 18 years of age by the day of the next ensuing election. The notice required in this subparagraph shall 20250HB1217PN1365 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(iv) Notice that political party enrollment is mandatory to vote in a primary election of a political party.(v) Notice that the commission will mail by nonforwardable mail to the applicant a voter's identification card upon acceptance of the application and that the applicant should contact the commission if the identification card is not received within 14 days from the date the application is sent to the registration office.(vi) Notice that registration is not complete until the application is processed and accepted by the commission.(vii) A warning to the applicant that making a false registration or furnishing false information is perjury. The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(viii) Instructions to Federal or State employees who wish to retain voting residence in county of last residence to so indicate on the application.(ix) Notice that, if an individual declines to register to vote, the fact that the individual has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes. The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(x) Notice that, if an individual does register to vote, the office at which the individual submits a voter 20250HB1217PN1365 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration application will remain confidential and will be used for voter registration purposes only. The notices required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration in subsection (b).(5) In jurisdictions where there is a single language minority, the secretary may print a bilingual application.(6) In jurisdictions where a single language minority exceeds 5% of the population, the secretary shall:(i) print a bilingual application; and(ii) conduct a public educational program among that language group alerting both organizations and individuals of that group of the availability of the bilingual application and encouraging individuals to register.(7) To implement section 724-A, the secretary shall print an official voter registration mail application designed to preserve the confidentiality of the information required to be submitted. The application shall contain information required by this section and shall include the name of each county seat, its post office mailing address and zip code and its telephone number. Voter registration mail applications shall contain information indicating whether the application is a new registration, change of party enrollment, change of address or change of name.(8) Nothing under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV shall prohibit a private organization or individual from printing blank voter registration applications or shall prohibit the use of such applications by any other individual, provided that the form, content and paper quality of such voter registration application complies with 20250HB1217PN1365 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department regulations for the forms or has received prior approval from the secretary.(b) Registration declaration.--(1) The official voter registration application shall contain a registration declaration. On the declaration, the applicant shall state all of the following:(i) The applicant has been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election.(ii) On the day of the next ensuing election, the applicant shall be at least 18 years of age.(iii) On the day of the next ensuing election, the applicant shall have resided in this Commonwealth and in the election district for at least 30 days.(iv) The applicant is legally qualified to vote.(2) The applicant shall affirm all of the following:(i) The information provided in the registration declaration is true.(ii) The applicant understands that:(A) the registration declaration will be accepted for all purposes as the equivalent of an affidavit; and(B) if the registration contains a material false statement, the applicant shall be subject to penalties for perjury.(3) The registration declaration shall contain the printed name and signature of the applicant and the date of signing. An applicant unable to sign the voter registration application shall make a mark before a person of the applicant's choice other than the applicant's employer or an agent of the applicant's union. The person shall insert the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person's name, address and telephone number. If the person is an employee or agent of the Department of Transportation or another agency as provided under section 725-A and is assisting the applicant in an official capacity, the employee or agent shall insert the initials and identification number of the employee or agent. In the case of applicants registering under section 723-A or 725-A, the person providing assistance shall insert initials or employee or agent identification number on a separate or detachable portion of the application or computer data file.(4) The official registration application shall contain a notice entitled "PENALTY FOR FALSIFYING DECLARATION." The notice shall advise the applicant that if a person signs an official registration application knowing a statement declared in the application to be false, the person commits perjury. The notice shall specify the penalty for perjury.(c) Distribution.--(1) The secretary shall supply official registration applications to commissions.(2) The secretary shall make available for distribution official voter registration applications to public libraries, public schools, State-related institutions of higher education, offices operated by the Department of Revenue, offices operated by the Department of Aging, area agencies on aging, offices operated by the Pennsylvania Game Commission or any of its authorized license-issuing agents, offices operated by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission or any of its issuing agents and offices that provide unemployment compensation.(3) Each participating agency identified under paragraph 20250HB1217PN1365 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) shall:(i) Provide that official voter registration mail applications are available on the premises and displayed prominently in a conspicuous location during normal business hours.(ii) Provide an official voter registration mail application to any individual requesting one.(iii) Provide reasonable space for nonpartisan signs or posters indicating the availability of official voter registration mail applications on the premises.(4) The secretary may provide technical assistance to commissions upon request and agencies designated under paragraph (2).(5) The secretary shall print and distribute mail registration applications which are not postage paid and which shall not be specific to any county registration office. Along with the distribution of such applications, the secretary shall also include instructions to inform the applicant where the application is to be sent.(6) The secretary and commissions shall supply applications to all of the following:(i) Persons and organizations who request applications.(ii) Federal, State and political subdivision offices.(iii) Political parties and political bodies.(iv) Candidates.(d) Staff.--Agency employees assisting in the distribution of voter registration applications under subsection (c) shall conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the following 20250HB1217PN1365 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 principles:(1) They shall not seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration or display political preference or party allegiance.(2) They shall not make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose of or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote.(3) They shall not make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose of or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.Agency employees who violate this subsection shall be removed from employment, provided that the agency at its discretion may impose a penalty of suspension without pay for at least 30 days, but not more than 120 days, if it finds that the violation does not warrant termination.Section 728-A. Approval of registration applications.(a) Examination.--Upon receiving a voter registration application, a commissioner, clerk or registrar of a commission shall do all of the following:(1) Initial and date the receipt of the application.(2) Examine the application to determine all of the following:(i) Whether the application is complete.(ii) Whether the applicant is a qualified elector, including verification of the last four digits of the applicant's Social Security number and the applicant's Department of Transportation driver's license number or Department of Transportation identification card number, 20250HB1217PN1365 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if available.(iii) Whether the applicant has an existing registration record. After the commission is connected to the SURE system, the commissioner, clerk or registrar shall search the SURE system on a Statewide basis to determine if the applicant has an existing registration record. The commissioner, clerk or registrar shall take special care to scrutinize any registration for a similar name at the same registered address.(iv) Whether the applicant is entitled or qualified to receive the requested transfer or change, if applicable.(b) Decision.--A commission shall do one of the following:(1) Record and forward a voter registration application to the proper commission if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) that the applicant does not reside within the commission's county but resides elsewhere in this Commonwealth.(2) Reject a voter registration application, indicate the rejection and the reasons for the rejection on the application and notify the applicant by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed of the rejection and the reason if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) any of the following:(i) The application was not properly completed and, after reasonable efforts by the commission to ascertain the necessary information, the application remains incomplete or inconsistent.(ii) The applicant is not a qualified elector.(iii) The applicant is not entitled to a transfer of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration or a change of address.(iv) The applicant is not legally qualified for a change of name.A rejection shall be made no later than 25 days before the election succeeding the filing of the application.(3) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(4) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration records if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.(5) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and request transfer of registration records in accordance with subsection (d) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified 20250HB1217PN1365 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of another county.(6) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and request transfer of registration records in accordance with subsection (d) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests a transfer of registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of another county.(7) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests a change of address.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.(8) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration records if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests a change of name.20250HB1217PN1365 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The applicant is legally qualified to a change of name.(iii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iv) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.(c) Processing of voter registration.--(1) When a commission has accepted a voter registration application under subsection (b)(3), the commission shall assign each applicant a unique identification number in the SURE system. The commission shall mail a durable, wallet-sized voter's identification card to the individual by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed, which shall serve as notice of the acceptance of the application. The card shall contain all of the following:(i) Name and address of the individual.(ii) Name of municipality of residence.(iii) Identification of the individual's ward and district.(iv) The effective date of registration.(v) Designation of party enrollment and date of enrollment.(vi) An image of the individual's signature or mark. (vii) The unique identification number of the individual.(viii) A statement that the individual must notify the commission within 10 days from the date it was mailed if any information on the card is incorrect otherwise, the information shall be deemed correct for voter 20250HB1217PN1365 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration purposes.(ix) A scannable identification code or strip.(2) When a commission has accepted a voter registration application under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6), (7) or (8), the commission shall mail a durable, wallet-sized voter's identification card to the individual by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed, which shall serve as notice of the acceptance of the application. The card shall contain all of the following:(i) Name and address of the individual.(ii) Name of municipality of residence.(iii) Identification of the individual's ward and district.(iv) The effective date of registration.(v) Designation of party enrollment and date of enrollment.(vi) An image of the individual's signature or mark. (vii) The SURE registration number of the individual.(viii) A statement that the individual must notify the commission within 10 days from the date it was mailed if any information on the card is incorrect, otherwise, the information shall be deemed correct for voter registration purposes.(ix) A scannable identification code or strip.(3) An envelope containing a voter identification card shall be marked on the outside with a request to the postmaster to return it within five days if it cannot be delivered to the addressee at the address given.(d) Transfer of registration records.--20250HB1217PN1365 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If, during application, an individual discloses that the individual is a registered elector of another county, the commission of the individual's new county of residence shall direct a cancellation notice to the commission of the individual's former county of residence in accordance with regulations promulgated under this article or 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV.(2) Upon receipt of a notice transmitted in accordance with paragraph (1), the commission of the individual's former county of residence shall investigate. If the commission finds that the individual is a registered elector of the county, the commission shall verify the address change with the registered elector in accordance with this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV. Upon verifying that the registered elector has moved to another county of residence, the commission shall cancel the registered elector's registration, transfer a copy of the canceled registration record to the commission of the registered elector's new county of residence and retain a record of the transfer. The commission of both counties shall promptly update information contained in their registration records.(e) Challenges.--All challenges to applications for registration shall be made as provided in section 729-A.Section 728.1-A. SURE registration number.Each registered elector shall be assigned a single and unique SURE registration number in accordance with sections 728-A and 25 Pa.C.S. § 1514 (relating to conversion of registration records). Once assigned, a SURE registration number shall not be changed, modified or altered.Section 729-A. Challenges.20250HB1217PN1365 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Standing.--An individual claiming the right to be registered may be challenged by a commissioner, registrar or clerk or by a qualified elector of the municipality.(b) Complaint.--To make a challenge, a complainant must file a challenge affidavit in a form prescribed by the secretary containing the following information:(1) Name of challenged individual.(2) Address of challenged individual.(3) Name of complainant.(4) Address of complainant.(5) Date of affidavit.(6) Reason for challenge.(c) Response.--An individual who is challenged must respond to the challenge affidavit as provided in subsection (b) in a written statement sworn or affirmed by the individual. The challenged individual must produce such other evidence as may be required to satisfy the registrar or commissioner as to the individual's qualifications as a qualified elector.(d) Resolution.--If the challenged individual establishes to the satisfaction of the commission the right to be registered as required under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration), the challenged individual shall be registered. If the challenged individual does not establish to the satisfaction of the commission the right to be registered as provided under this article and 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV, the challenged individual's registration, if any, shall be canceled, and the commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.Section 730-A. (Reserved).Section 731-A. Privacy in voter registration.20250HB1217PN1365 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The secretary shall provide a means for an elector who has an active protection from abuse order under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) entered against another party to have the elector's birth date recorded in the SURE system so that the birth year shall be listed as not fewer than 18 years and not greater than 50 years prior to the year in which the claim was made. The secretary shall ensure that the accommodation under this section shall end when the protection from abuse order expires.Section 10. Section 1003(f) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1003. Form of Official Election Ballot.--* * *[(f) In order that each elector may have the opportunity of designating his choice for all the candidates nominated by one political party or political body, there shall be printed on the extreme left of the ballot, and separated from the rest of the ballot by a space of at least one-half inch, a list of the names of all the political parties or political bodies represented on such ballot which have nominated candidates to be voted for at such election. Such names shall be arranged in the order of the votes obtained at the last gubernatorial election by the candidate for Governor of the parties or bodies nominating, beginning with the party that received the highest number of votes cast. Following the names of such political parties and political bodies shall be the names of the parties and bodies not represented on the ballot at the last gubernatorial election, arranged alphabetically, according to the party name or appellation. A square of sufficient size for the convenient insertion of a cross mark shall be placed at the right of each 20250HB1217PN1365 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 party name or appellation.]* * *(h) The official ballots shall be printed on paper of the correct size for the machines used by a county and watermarked with the name of the county in which it shall be used.Section 11. Section 1007(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 1007. Number of Ballots to Be Printed; Specimen Ballots.--(a) The county board of each county shall provide for each election district a supply of official election ballots for:[(7) any primary election in an amount equal to at least 50% of the total number of registered electors in an election district, less the number of registered electors in the election district who have requested an absentee or mail-in ballot; and(8) any general election in an amount equal to at least 100% of the total number of registered electors in an election district, less the number of registered electors in the election district who have requested an absentee or mail-in ballot.](9) the general primary election held in even-numbered years in which candidates for the office of President of the United States are not nominated in an amount of at least 10% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in the election district in any of the previous three general primary elections at which candidates for the office of President of the United States were not nominated;(10) the general primary election held in even-numbered years in which candidates for the office of President of the United States are nominated in an amount of at least 15% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in the election district in any of the previous three general primary elections at which 20250HB1217PN1365 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 candidates for the office of President of the United States were nominated;(11) the municipal primary election held in odd-numbered years in an amount of at least 10% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in any of the previous three municipal primary elections in the election district;(12) the general election held in even-numbered years in which candidates for the office of President of the United States are not elected in an amount of at least 10% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in the election district in any of the previous three general elections at which candidates for the office of President of the United States were not elected;(13) the general election held in even-numbered years in which candidates for the office of President of the United States are elected in an amount of at least 15% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in the election districts in any of the previous three general elections at which candidates for the office of President of the United States were elected; and(14) the municipal election held in odd-numbered years in an amount of at least 10% greater than the highest number of ballots cast in any of the previous three municipal elections in the election district.* * *Section 12. Sections 1106, 1107 and 1111 of the act are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1106. Examination and Approval of Voting Machines by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--* * *(g) Examination shall include, but is not limited to, 20250HB1217PN1365 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 testing of all software required for the voting system's operation, the ballot reader, the digital printer, the fail-safe operations, the counting center environmental requirements and the equipment reliability estimate.(h) For the purposes of examining the system, the secretary shall employ or contract for the services of at least one individual who is an expert in one or more fields of data processing, mechanical engineering and public administration and shall require from the individual a written report of his or her examination.(i) Within thirty days after completing the examination and upon approval of any electronic or electromechanical voting system, the secretary shall make and maintain a report on the system, together with a written or printed description and drawings and photographs clearly identifying the system and the operation thereof. As soon as practicable after the filing, the department shall send a notice of certification and upon request, a copy of the report to county boards of elections in this Commonwealth. The report under this subsection shall be a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(j) After a voting system has been approved by the secretary, any change or improvement in the system must be approved by the secretary prior to the adoption of the change or improvement by a county. If the change or improvement does not comply with the requirements of this act, the secretary shall suspend sales of the equipment or system in this Commonwealth until the equipment or system complies with the requirements of this act.(k) The secretary shall examine and approve at least two 20250HB1217PN1365 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible voting machines which meet the requirements of section 1123-A . (l) The secretary shall examine and approve all electronic or electromechanical devices used in the casting, processing or tabulation of ballots or in the recording of electors, including, but not limited to, ballot sorters, envelope extractors, ballot scanners and electronic pollbooks.(m) The examination and approval under subsection (l) shall ensure that the device conforms with standards to provide timeliness and accuracy in the casting and counting of ballots or in the recording of electors.Section 1107. Requirements of Voting Machines.--No voting machine shall, upon any examination or reexamination, be approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or by any examiner appointed by him, unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:* * *(u) It shall immediately reject a ballot where the number of votes for an office or question exceeds the number which the elector is entitled to cast or where the tabulating equipment reads the ballot as a ballot with no votes cast.(v) It shall be capable of providing records from which the operation of the voting system may be audited.(w) It shall be capable of recording votes from ballots of different political parties from the same precinct for a primary election.(x) It shall be manufactured in the United States and sold by a vendor with a primary place of business within the United States.(y) It shall utilize open-source software code.20250HB1217PN1365 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (z) It shall fully comply with the most recently adopted Voluntary Voting System Guidelines developed by the Election Assistance Commission.(z.1) The requirements of subsections (u), (v), (w), (x), (y) and (z) shall apply only to machines newly examined or approved by the secretary after 2025. No machines purchased by a county prior to 2025 shall be decertified on the basis of noncompliance with subsection (u), (v), (w), (x), (y) or (z).Section 1111. Preparation of Voting Machines by County Election Boards.--* * *(g) On any day not more than thirty-five (35) days before the commencement of voting, the county election board shall have the automatic tabulating equipment publicly tested to ascertain that the equipment will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all measures. If the ballots to be used at the polling place on election day are not available at the time of the testing, the county election board may conduct an additional test not more than ten (10) days before election day. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be given at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the test by publication on the county election board's publicly accessible Internet website and once in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county, by posting the notice in at least four conspicuous places in the county. The county election board shall provide written notice to each candidate for election of the time and location of the public preelection test. The test shall be open to representatives of the political parties, the press and the public and shall be video recorded and broadcast simultaneously 20250HB1217PN1365 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on a publicly accessible Internet website. Each political party may designate one person with expertise in the computer field who shall be allowed in the central counting room when tests are being conducted and when the official votes are being counted. The designee shall not interfere with the normal operation of the canvassing board.(h) For electronic or electromechanical voting systems configured to tabulate mail-in or absentee ballots at a central or regional site, the public testing shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so produced as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and to include one or more ballots for each office which have activated voting positions in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating equipment to reject the votes. If an error is detected, the cause of the error shall be corrected and an errorless count shall be made before the automatic tabulating equipment is approved. The test shall be repeated and errorless results must be achieved immediately before the start of the official count of the ballots and again after the completion of the official count. The programs and ballots used for testing shall be sealed and retained under the custody of the county election board.(i) For electronic or electromechanical voting systems configured to include electronic or electromechanical tabulation devices which are distributed to the precincts, all or a sample of the devices to be used in the election shall be publicly tested. If a sample is to be tested, the sample shall consist of a random selection of at least ten per cent of the devices. The test shall be conducted by processing a group of ballots, 20250HB1217PN1365 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 causing the device to output results for the ballots processed and comparing the output of results to the results expected for the ballots processed. The group of ballots shall be produced so as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and to include for each office one or more ballots which have activated voting positions in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the tabulating device to reject such votes.(j) If a tested tabulating device is found to have an error in tabulation, it shall be deemed unsatisfactory. For each device deemed unsatisfactory, the county election board shall take steps to determine the cause of the error, shall attempt to identify and test other devices that could reasonably be expected to have the same error and shall test a number of additional devices sufficient to determine that each device is satisfactory. Upon deeming a device unsatisfactory, the county election board may require all devices to be tested or may declare that all devices are unsatisfactory.(k) If the operation or output of any tested tabulation device, such as spelling or the order of candidates on a report, is in error, the problem shall be reported to the county election board, which shall determine if the reported problem warrants the county election board deeming the device unsatisfactory.(l) At the completion of testing under this section, the county election board, the representatives of the political parties and the candidates or their representatives who attended the test shall witness the resetting of each device that passed to a preelection state of readiness and the sealing of each device that passed in such a manner as to secure its state of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 readiness until the opening of the polls.(m) The county election board shall execute a written statement setting forth the tabulation devices tested, the results of the testing, the protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device, the number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing, any problems reported to the board as a result of the testing and whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory. The written statement under this subsection shall be a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(n) Any tabulating device deemed unsatisfactory shall be recoded, repaired or replaced and shall be made available for retesting. The device must be determined by the county election board to be satisfactory before the device may be used in an election. The county election board shall announce at the close of the first testing the date, place and time that an unsatisfactory device will be retested or may, at the option of the board, notify by telephone each person who was present at the first testing as to the date, place and time that the retesting will occur.(o) Records must be kept of all preelection testing of electronic or electromechanical tabulation devices used in an election. The records shall be present and available for inspection and reference during public preelection testing by any person in attendance during the testing. The need of the county election board for access to the records during the testing shall take precedence over the need of other attendees to access such records so that the work of the county election board will not be delayed or hindered. Records of testing must 20250HB1217PN1365 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include, for each device, the name of each person who tested the device and the date, place, time and results of each test. Records of testing shall be retained as part of the official records of the election in which any device was used and shall be public records u nder the "Right-to-Know Law." (p) The county election board shall submit a copy of all records required under this section to the Office of the Auditor General.Section 13. Sections 1112(c)1, 1106-A and 1117-A of the act are amended to read:Section 1112. Delivery of Voting Machines and Supplies by County Election Boards to Election Officers.--* * *(c) The county election board shall furnish, at the expense of the county, and deliver with each voting machine:1. A [lantern] flashlight, or a proper substitute for one, which, in the case of a loss of electricity, shall give sufficient light to enable voters, while in the voting machine booth, to read the ballot labels, and suitable for the use of election officers in examining the counters. The [lantern] flashlight, or proper substitute therefor, shall be prepared and in good order for use before the opening of the polls.* * *Section 1106-A. Experimental Use of Electronic Voting Systems.--(a) The county board of elections of any county may provide for experimental use at any primary or election in one or more election districts of said county, of an electronic voting system, and the use of such system shall be as valid for all purposes as if the electronic voting system had been adopted in accordance with the provisions of this act.20250HB1217PN1365 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may approve the use of an experimental electronic voting system by the county board of elections of any county which complies with section 1306(a) for absentee voters as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (Public Law 99-410, 100 Stat. 924) and for disabled voters if the system allows the elector to mark his electronic ballot in secrecy as provided for paper absentee ballots pursuant to section 1306(a). The system shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 1107-A, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305 and 1306.(c) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall investigate the use and viability of blockchain technology for the purposes of electronic voting by disabled voters and absentee voters as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act.Section 1117-A. [Statistical Sample.--The county board of elections, as part of the computation and canvass of returns, shall conduct a statistical recount of a random sample of ballots after each election using manual, mechanical or electronic devices of a type different than those used for the specific election. The sample shall include at least two (2) per centum of the votes cast or two thousand (2,000) votes whichever is the lesser.] Post-election Audit.--The county board of elections, as part of the computation and canvass of returns, and prior to certification, shall cooperate in a result-confirming audit conducted by the department of the Auditor General. The audit shall be a ballot-comparison risk-limiting audit, conducted with a risk limit of one (1) per centum for mail-in and absentee ballots and for ballots cast on voting machines, the audit shall be a ballot-polling risk-limiting 20250HB1217PN1365 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 audit, conducted with a risk limit of one (1) per centum.Section 14. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1123-A. Requirements of Accessible Voting Machines.--An accessible voting machine may not, upon any examination or reexamination, be approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or by an examiner appointed by the secretary, unless the accessible voting machine satisfies the following requirements:(1) The voting system must provide a tactile input or audio input device, or both.(2) The voting system must provide a method by which voters can confirm any tactile or audio input by having the capability of audio output using synthetic or recorded human speech that is reasonably phonetically accurate.(3) Any operable controls on the input device which are needed for voters who are visually impaired must be discernible tactilely without actuating the keys.(4) Audio and visual access approaches must be able to work both separately and simultaneously.(5) If a nonaudio access approach is provided, the system may not require color perception. The system must use black text or graphics, or both, on white background or white text or graphics, or both, on black background, unless the office of the secretary approves other high-contrast color combinations that do not require color perception.(6) Any voting system that requires any visual perception must offer the election official who programs the system, prior to its being sent to the polling place, the capability to set the font size, as it appears to the voter, from a minimum of 14 points to a maximum of 24 points.20250HB1217PN1365 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) The voting system must provide audio information, including any audio output using synthetic or recorded human speech or any auditory feedback tones that are important for the use of the audio approach, through at least one mode, by handset or headset, in enhanced auditory fashion (increased amplification), and must provide incremental volume control with output amplification up to a level of at least 97 db spl.(8) For transmitted voice signals to the voter, the voting system must provide a gain adjustable up to a minimum of 20 db spl with at least one intermediate step of 12 db spl of gain.(9) For the safety of others, if the voting system has the possibility of exceeding 120 db spl, a mechanism must be included to reset the volume automatically to the voting system's default volume level after every use.(10) If sound cues and audible information such as "beeps" are used, there must be simultaneous corresponding visual cues and information.(11) Controls and operable mechanisms must be operable with one hand, including operability with a closed fist and operability without tight grasping, pinching or twisting of the wrist.(12) The force required to operate or activate the controls must be no greater than five pounds of force.(13) Voting booths must have voting controls at a minimum height of 36 inches above the finished floor with a minimum knee clearance of 27 inches high, 30 inches wide and 19 inches deep, or the accessible voter interface devices must be designed so as to allow their use on top of a table to meet these requirements. Tabletop installations must include adequate privacy.(14) Any audio ballot must provide the voter with the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following functionalities:(i) After the initial instructions that the system requires election officials to provide to each voter, the voter should be able to independently operate the voter interface through the final step of casting a ballot without assistance.(ii) The voter must be able to determine the races that he or she is allowed to vote in and to determine which candidates are available in each race.(iii) The voter must be able to determine how many candidates may be selected in each race.(iv) The voter must be able to have confidence that the physical or vocal inputs given to the system have selected the candidates that he or she intended to select.(v) The voter must be able to review the candidate selections that he or she has made.(vi) Prior to the act of casting the ballot, the voter must be able to change any selections previously made and confirm a new selection.(vii) The system must communicate to the voter the fact that the voter has failed to vote in a race or has failed to vote the number of allowable candidates in any race and require the voter to confirm his or her intent to undervote before casting the ballot.(viii) The system must prevent the voter from overvoting any race.(ix) The voter must be able to input a candidate's name in each race that allows a write-in candidate.(x) The voter must be able to review his or her write-in input to the interface, edit that input and confirm that the edits meet the voter's intent.20250HB1217PN1365 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xi) There must be a clear, identifiable action that the voter takes to "cast" the ballot. The system must make clear to the voter how to take this action so that the voter has minimal risk of taking the action accidentally but, when the voter intends to cast the ballot, the action can be easily performed.(xii) Once the ballot is cast, the system must confirm to the voter that the action has occurred and that the voter's process of voting is complete.(xiii) Once the ballot is cast, the system must preclude the voter from modifying the ballot cast or voting or casting another ballot.Section 1124-A. Voting System Defects, Disclosure, Investigations and Penalties.-- (a) No lat er than January 1 of every odd-numbered year, each vendor shall file a written disclosure with the department identifying any known defect in the voting system or the fact that there is no known defect, the effect of any defect on the operation and use of the approved voting system and any known corrective measures to cure a defect, including, but not limited to, advisories and bulletins issued to system users.(b) Implementation of corrective measures approved by the department which enable a system to conform to the standards and ensure the timeliness and accuracy of the casting and counting of ballots constitutes a cure of a defect.(c) If a vendor becomes aware of the existence of a defect, the vendor must file a new disclosure with the department as provided in subsection (a) within 30 days of the date the vendor determined or reasonably should have determined that the defect existed.(d) If a vendor discloses to the department that a defect 20250HB1217PN1365 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exists, the department may suspend all sales or leases of the voting system in this Commonwealth and may suspend the use of the system in any election in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice of a suspension under this subsection to the affected vendor and county boards of elections. If the department determines that the defect no longer exists, the department shall lift the suspension and provide written notice to each affected vendor and supervisor of elections.(e) If a vendor fails to file a required disclosure for a voting system previously approved by the department, that system may not be sold, leased or used for elections in this Commonwealth until the voting system has been submitted for examination and approval under this act. The department shall provide written notice to each county board of elections that the system is no longer approved.(f) If the department has reasonable cause to believe a voting system approved under this act contains a defect either before, during or after an election which has not been disclosed pursuant to this section, the department shall investigate whether the voting system has a defect.(g) The department shall initiate an investigation on its own initiative or upon the written request of the board of elections of a county that purchased a voting system that contains the alleged defect.(h) Upon initiation of an investigation, the department shall provide written notice to the vendor and each county board of elections.(i) If the department determines by a preponderance of the evidence that a defect exists in the voting system, or that 20250HB1217PN1365 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vendor failed to timely disclose a defect under this section, the department shall provide written notice to the affected vendor and county board of elections.(j) A vendor who receives notice of a defect shall, within ten days of receipt of the notice under subsection (i) , file a written response to the department which:(1) denies that the alleged defect exists or existed as alleged by the department or that the vendor failed to timely disclose a defect and sets forth the reasons for the denial; or(2) admits that the defect exists or existed as alleged by the department or that the vendor failed to timely disclose a defect.(k) If the defect has been cured, the vendor shall provide an explanation of how the defect was cured.(l) If the defect has not been cured, the vendor shall inform the department whether the defect can be cured and shall provide the department with a plan for curing the defect.(m) If the defect can be cured, the department shall establish a time frame within which to cure the defect.(n) If, after receiving a response from the vendor, the department determines that a defect does not exist or has been cured within the time frame established by the department, the department shall take no further action.(o) If the department determines that a vendor failed to timely disclose a defect or that a defect exists and a vendor has not filed a written response or has failed to cure the defect within the time frame established by the department, or if the defect cannot be cured, the department shall impose a civil penalty of $25,000 for the defect plus an amount equal to the actual costs incurred by the department in conducting the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation.(p) If the department finds that a defect existed: (1) The department may suspend all sales and leases of the voting system and may suspend its use in any county in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice of the suspension to each affected vendor and county board of elections.(2) If the department determines that a defect no longer exists in a voting system that has been suspended from use under this section, the department shall lift the suspension and authorize the sale, lease and use of the voting system in any election in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice that the suspension has been lifted to each affected vendor and county board of elections.(3) If the defect cannot be cured, the department may disapprove the voting system for use in elections in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice to all directors of elections that the system is no longer approved. After approval of a system that has been withdrawn under this paragraph, the system may not be sold, leased or used in this Commonwealth until it has been resubmitted for examination and approval and adopted for use under this act.(4) A vendor for whom a civil penalty was imposed under this section may not submit a voting system for approval by the department or enter into a contract for sale or lease of a voting system in this Commonwealth until each civil penalty has been paid and the department provides written confirmation of the payment to the county board of elections.(q) The department shall prepare a written report of any investigation conducted under this section and submit the report 20250HB1217PN1365 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(r) The authority of the department under this section shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other authority provided by law.(s) For the purposes of this section: "Defect" means a failure, fault or flaw in an electronic or electro-mechanic voting system approved under this act, which results in nonconformance with the standards in a manner that affects the timeliness or accuracy of the casting or counting of ballots or a failure or inability of the voting system manufacturer or vendor to make available and provide approved replacements of hardware or software to the counties that have purchased the approved voting system, the unavailability of which results in the system's nonconformance with the standards in a manner that affects the timeliness or accuracy of the casting or counting of ballots."Department" means the Department of State of the Commonwealth.Section 15. Article XI-B of the act is repealed:[ARTICLE XI-BVOTING APPARATUS BONDSSection 1101-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The County Voting Apparatus Reimbursement Account established under section 1106-B."Authority." The Pennsylvania Economic Development Financing Authority."Bond." Any type of revenue obligation, including a bond or series of bonds, note, certificate or other instrument, issued by the authority for the benefit of the department under this article."Bond administrative expenses." Expenses incurred to administer bonds as provided under the Financing Law, or as otherwise necessary to ensure compliance with applicable Federal or State law."Bond obligations." The principal of a bond and any premium and interest payable on a bond, together with any amount owed under a related credit agreement or a related resolution of the authority authorizing a bond."Credit agreement." A loan agreement, a revolving credit agreement, an agreement establishing a line of credit, a letter of credit or another agreement that enhances the marketability, security or creditworthiness of a bond."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Election security equipment." Information technology such as intrusion detection sensors and other infrastructure deployed to enhance the security of voting apparatus and election systems by detecting and reporting hacking attempts and other election security breaches."Electronic voting system." As defined in section 1101-A."Financing Law." The act of August 23, 1967 (P.L.251, No.102), known as the Economic Development Financing Law.20250HB1217PN1365 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Voting apparatus." A kind or type of electronic voting system that received the approval of the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1105-A.Section 1102-B. Bond issuance.(a) Declaration of policy.--The General Assembly finds and declares that funding the replacement of voting apparatuses, including interest, through the authority, is in the best interest of this Commonwealth.(b) Authority.--Notwithstanding any other law, the following shall apply:(1) The department may be a project applicant under the Financing Law and may apply to the authority for the funding of the replacement of voting apparatuses.(2) The authority may issue bonds under the Financing Law, consistent with this article, to finance projects to fund the replacement of county voting apparatuses or to reimburse counties for their cost to purchase or enter into capital leases for voting apparatuses.(3) Participation of an industrial and commercial development authority shall not be required to finance the replacement of voting apparatuses.(c) Debt or liability.--(1) Bonds issued under this article shall not be a debt or liability of the Commonwealth and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Commonwealth.(2) Bond obligations and bond administrative expenses shall be payable solely from revenues or money pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this article. This paragraph shall include the proceeds of any issuance of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bonds.(3) Each bond shall contain on its face a statement that:(i) the authority is obligated to pay the principal or interest on the bonds only from the revenues or money pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this article;(ii) neither the Commonwealth nor a county is obligated to pay the principal or interest; and(iii) the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any county is not pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.Section 1103-B. Criteria for bond issuance.(a) Determination.--If the department decertifies one or more voting apparatuses that are in use in any county of this Commonwealth, the department shall apply to the authority to issue bonds for reimbursements to each county for the cost of procuring new voting apparatuses.(a.1) Issuance.--Bonds may be issued in one or more series, and each series may finance reimbursement grants to one or more counties.(b) Terms.--(1) The department, with the approval of the Office of the Budget, shall specify in its application to the authority:(i) the maximum principal amount of the bonds for each bond issue; and(ii) the maximum term of the bonds consistent with applicable law.(2) The total principal amount for all bonds issued 20250HB1217PN1365 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this article may not exceed $90,000,000.(3) The term of the bonds issued under this article may not exceed 10 years from the respective date of original issuance.(c) Expiration.--For the purpose of this article, authorization to issue bonds, not including refunding bonds, shall expire December 31, 2020.Section 1104-B. Issuance of bonds, security and sources of payments.(a) Issuance.--The authority shall consider issuance of bonds upon application by the department. Bonds issued under this article shall be subject to the provisions of the Financing Law, unless otherwise specified under this article.(b) Service agreement authorized.--The authority and the department may enter into an agreement or service agreement to effectuate this article, including an agreement to secure bonds issued for the purposes under section 1102-B(b), pursuant to which the department shall agree to pay the bond obligations and bond administrative expenses to the authority in each fiscal year that the bonds or refunding bonds are outstanding in amounts sufficient to timely pay in full the bond obligations, bond administrative expenses and any other financing costs due on the bonds issued for the purposes under section 1102-B(b). The department's payment of the bond obligations, bond administrative expenses and other financing costs due on the bonds as service charges under an agreement or service agreement shall be subject to and dependent upon the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly to the department for payment of the service charges. The service agreement may be amended or supplemented by the authority and the department in connection 20250HB1217PN1365 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the issuance of any series of bonds or refunding bonds authorized under this section.(c) Security.--Bond obligations and bond administrative expenses may be secured, for the benefit of the holders of the bonds and the obligees under credit agreements or the agreements under subsection (b), by pledge of a security interest in and first lien on the following:(1) Money relating to the bonds held on deposit in any other fund or account under an instrument or agreement pertaining to the bonds, including bond reserves and interest income on the money.(2) The security provided under this subsection shall not apply to money in any fund relating to arbitrage rebate obligations.Section 1105-B. Sale of bonds.The authority shall offer the bonds for sale by means of a public, competitive sale or by means of a negotiated sale based on the authority's determination of which method will produce the most benefit to counties and the Commonwealth.Section 1106-B. Deposit of bond proceeds.The net proceeds of bonds, other than refunding bonds, exclusive of costs of issuance, reserves and any other financing charges, shall be transferred by the authority to the State Treasurer for deposit into a restricted account established in the State Treasury and held solely for the purposes under section 1102-B(b) to be known as the County Voting Apparatus Reimbursement Account. The department shall pay out the bond proceeds to the counties from the account in accordance with this article.Section 1107-B. Payment of bond-related obligations.20250HB1217PN1365 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For each fiscal year in which bond obligations and bond administrative expenses will be due, the authority shall notify the department of the amount of bond obligations and the estimated amount of bond administrative expenses in sufficient time, as determined by the department, to permit the department to request an appropriation sufficient to pay bond obligations and bond administrative expenses that will be due and payable in the following fiscal year. The authority's calculation of the amount of bond obligations and bond administrative expenses that will be due shall be subject to verification by the department.Section 1108-B. Commonwealth not to impair bond-related obligations.The Commonwealth pledges that it shall not do any of the following:(1) Limit or alter the rights and responsibilities of the authority or the department under this article, including the responsibility to:(i) pay bond obligations and bond administrative expenses; and(ii) comply with any other instrument or agreement pertaining to bonds.(2) Alter or limit the service agreement under section 1104-B(b).(3) Impair the rights and remedies of the holders of bonds, until each bond issued at any time and the interest on the bond are fully met and discharged.Section 1109-B. (Reserved).Section 1110-B. Personal liability.The members, directors, officers and employees of the department and the authority shall not be personally liable as a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 result of good faith exercise of the rights and responsibilities granted under this article.Section 1111-B. Annual report.No later than March 1 of the year following the first full year in which bonds have been issued under this article and for each year thereafter in which bond obligations existed in the prior year, the department shall submit an annual report to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives providing all data available on bonds issued or existing in the prior year. The report shall include existing and anticipated bond principal, interest and administrative costs, revenue, repayments, refinancing, overall benefits to counties and any other relevant data, facts and statistics that the department believes necessary in the content of the report.Section 1112-B. Reimbursement of county voting apparatus expenses.(a) Application.--A county may apply to the department to receive funding to replace the county's voting apparatuses or to reimburse the county's cost to purchase or lease by capital lease voting apparatuses. Each county shall submit an application for funding on a form containing information and documentation prescribed by the department no later than July 1, 2020.(b) Documentation for prior purchase or lease.--If a county seeks reimbursement of the county's cost to purchase or lease by 20250HB1217PN1365 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capital lease a voting apparatus that the county purchased or leased before the date that the county submits its application to the department, the county's application shall include documentation prescribed by the department to substantiate the county's cost to purchase or lease the voting apparatus, including copies of fully executed voting apparatus contracts, invoices and proof of payment to the vendor of the voting apparatus.(c) Documentation for subsequent purchase or lease.--If a county seeks funding to purchase or lease by capital lease a voting apparatus that the county will purchase or lease after the date that the county submits its application to the department, the county's application shall include documentation prescribed by the department to substantiate the county's estimate to purchase or lease the voting apparatus, including copies of fully executed voting apparatus contracts, bids or price quotes submitted to the county by voting apparatus vendors and other price estimates or cost proposals.(d) Review.--The department shall review each county application on a rolling basis and shall either approve or deny each county's application within 90 days of the date the application is received by the department. A county may supplement or amend submitted applications during the 90-day review period in consultation with the department.(e) Approval for prior purchase or lease.--If the department approves a county's application submitted under subsection (b), the department and the county shall enter into a written grant agreement through which the department shall reimburse the county at the amount determined under subsection (g).(f) Approval for subsequent purchase or lease.--If the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department approves a county's application under subsection (c), the department and the county shall enter into a written grant agreement through which the department will provide funding to reimburse the county's cost to purchase or lease a voting apparatus at the amount determined under subsection (g). The county shall hold the grant money in an account of the county that is separate from each other county account. The county shall deliver quarterly reports to the department of the voting apparatus costs paid from the grant money in a form prescribed by the department. The county shall return any unspent grant money to the department within 30 days of the expiration of the grant agreement.(g) Payments.--(1) A county shall only receive amounts under this section to the extent that the department has bond proceeds available in the account from which to make payments.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (3), a county which submitted an application approved under subsection (e) or (f) shall receive 60% of the total amount submitted under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid.(3) If the total amount submitted by all counties under paragraph (2) exceeds the total amount available for reimbursement or payment, a county shall receive a portion of the amount available equal to the total amount submitted by the county under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid, divided by the total amount submitted by all counties under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid.(4) If any bond proceeds remain after the department has issued all reimbursements in accordance with paragraphs (1), 20250HB1217PN1365 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) and (3), the department may utilize the remaining balance for grants for counties for the purchase and distribution to the counties of election security equipment. The department shall provide notice to each county no later than 30 days prior to receiving applications for grants under this paragraph.(h) Certification.--A county shall only receive the reimbursement or funding under this article after making a certification to the department, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives that the county has completed a program under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(1) (relating to removal of electors) and mailed notices required under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(3) within the prior 12 months. The certification shall include information on whether the county has undertaken a canvass under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(2).(i) Department application.--The department shall apply to the authority for funding under section 1102-B only if the department has approved county applications under this article which total at least $50,000,000.]Section 16. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XI-CELECTION EQUIPMENT FUNDING20250HB1217PN1365 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1101-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Election Equipment Funding Program Account established under section 1105-C(c)."Authority." The Commonwealth Financing Authority."Board." The board of directors of the authority."Election equipment." Any of the following:(1) Voting machines.(2) Sorters.(3) Extractors.(4) Electronic poll books.(5) Servers for data storage.(6) Tabulators."Program." The Election Equipment Funding Program established under section 1102-C.Section 1102-C. Establishment.The Election Equipment Funding Program is established. The authority shall administer and act as the fiscal agent for the program and shall be responsible for receiving and reviewing grant applications and awarding grants. The purpose of the program shall be to award grants to counties for the purchase and maintenance of election equipment.Section 1103-C. Grant awards.Grant awards shall be at the discretion of the authority and shall be limited to amounts appropriated to the authority for the program.Section 1104-C. Application.(a) Period.--The authority shall establish an annual 20250HB1217PN1365 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application period during which applications for grant funding under the program may be submitted. The annual application period shall be no fewer than 21 days and no longer than 60 days.(b) Form and contents.--An application shall be submitted to the authority . An application shall include the following information:(1) A receipt for the equipment purchased.(2) Verification that the specific equipment purchased has been certified by the Election Assistance Commission and the Department of State.(3) A copy of the security protocols for each type of equipment.(4) A copy of the most recent post-election audit conducted in that county.(5) A copy of the Auditor General's report on the most recent election conducted in that county, including any corrective action plan issued under section 109(e)(6).(6) A copy of any service contract agreed to as part of the purchase of equipment.(c) Review.--In reviewing an application, the authority shall conduct a review of each item required under subsection (b) to ensure that the county and equipment being purchased is in full compliance with this act.(d) Criteria.--The authority shall award grants based on a county's compliance with this act. Specific criteria to be considered when weighing an application shall be:(1) Whether the county submitting an application has provided proof of full compliance with this act during the most recent election.20250HB1217PN1365 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Whether the equipment purchased qualifies for reimbursement under this act.Section 1105-C. Implementation.(a) Requirements.-- (1) The requirements for the administration of the program shall be as follows:(i) An application for a grant under this section must be received by a deadline established by the authority.(ii) The authority shall execute a grant agreement between the board and a county before the payment of a grant award.(iii) A county shall maintain full and accurate records for the purchase or maintenance of election equipment.(iv) A county shall submit to the authority copies of all canceled checks or other records verifying expenditures of grant money.(2) The authority may establish additional requirements for the program as the authority deems necessary to administer the program.(b) Restrictions and limitations.-- (1) Any unused portion of a grant award shall be returned to the authority.(2) Grant money may not be used for any of the following:(i) The operation of satellite election offices or ballot return locations.(ii) The mailing of applications for mail-in or absentee ballots to electors.20250HB1217PN1365 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A voter education or election awareness program.(3) The authority may establish additional restrictions and limitations as the authority deems necessary to administer the program.(c) Account.-- (1) The authority shall establish the Election Equipment Funding Program Account.(2) The purpose of the account shall be to award grants under this act.(3) The following shall be sources of funding for the account:(i) Appropriations, including Federal money. (ii) Return on the money in the account. (4) Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the authority.(d) Guidelines.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the board shall adopt guidelines to implement this section. The guidelines shall include provisions for submission, review and approval of applications and award of grants.Section 17. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1201.3. Voter's Bill of Rights.-- Each registered voter in this Commonwealth shall have the right to:(1) Vote and have his or her vote accurately counted.(2) Cast a vote if he or she is in line at the time of the closing of polls.(3) Ask for and receive assistance in voting.(4) Receive up to two replacement ballots if he or she makes a mistake prior to the ballot being cast.(5) Receive an explanation if his or her registration or 20250HB1217PN1365 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identity is in question.(6) Cast a provisional ballot, if his or her registration or identity is in question.(7) Receive written instructions to use when voting and, upon request, oral instructions from elections officers to use when voting.(8) Vote free from coercion or intimidation by elections officers or any other person.(9) Vote on a voting system that is in working condition and that will allow votes to be accurately cast and accurately counted.(10) Any other rights as provided by Federal, State or local law.Section 1201.4. Senior Voter's Bill of Rights.--In addition to the rights of a voter under section 1201.3, a voter in this Commonwealth who is 70 years of age or older shall have the right to:(1) Receive any assistance necessary to successfully cast a ballot.(2) Move to the front of the line upon arrival at a polling place.(3) Receive assistance through supervised voting under section 1306.2.(4) Any other rights as provided by Federal, State or local law.Section 1201.5. Disabled Voter's Bill of Rights.--In addition to the rights of a voter under section 1201.3, a voter in this Commonwealth who is disabled shall have the right to:(1) Receive any assistance necessary to successfully cast a ballot.20250HB1217PN1365 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Move to the front of the line upon arrival at a polling place.(3) Bring into a polling place or elections office a service animal qualified under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities).(4) Vote using an accessible voting machine approved under this act.(5) Have all polling places in this Commonwealth meet accessibility requirements under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126.(6) For a polling place that meets accessibility requirements under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327), request that a ballot be brought by election officers outside the polling place of the qualified elector, provided that:(i) A qualified elector's vote under this section shall be cast within one hundred fifty (150) feet of the entrance to the polling place.(ii) The qualified elector shall mark the ballot in the presence of two election officers, with one representing each of the political parties with the greatest number of registered electors in this Commonwealth.(iii) The qualified elector shall mark the ballot in a secret manner and, obscuring the vote, return the ballot to the election officers. The election officers shall immediately return to the polling place and deposit the ballot in the voting machine.(iv) The electronic poll book utilized by the polling place shall be brought to the qualified elector, if possible, or otherwise made to record the qualified elector's participation in the election.20250HB1217PN1365 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) A record shall be made of each elector voting under this section and of each election officer assisting in the casting of each such ballot.(7) Any other rights as provided by Federal, State or local law.Section 18. Sections 1204, 1205, 1209(a), 1210(a.3)(4), 1218(a) and 1231(a) and (b)(1), (3) and (4) of the act are amended to read:Section 1204. Delivery of Ballots and Supplies to Judges of Election.--(a) The [cards of instruction, return sheets, tally papers, statements, oaths of election officers, affidavits, voter's certificates, and other forms and supplies required for use in each election district, and also the district register of such district, and in districts in which ballots are used, the official and specimen ballots prepared for use therein, shall be packed by the county board of elections in separate sealed packages for each election district, marked on the outside so as to clearly designate the districts for which they are intended, and, in the case of districts in which ballots are used, the number of ballots of each kind enclosed. They shall then be delivered by the county board,] following materials shall be prepared by the county board and delivered to all districts:(1) Cards of instruction.(2) Return sheets.(3) Tally papers.(4) Statements.(5) Written oaths of election officers.(6) Affidavits.(7) Voter's certificates.(8) Other forms and supplies.20250HB1217PN1365 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) The district register of each district.(10) The official and sample ballots prepared.(b) The materials shall be delivered by the election board, together with the ballot box, which shall bear the name and number of the election district, to the judges of election in the [several] election districts[,] not later than the day prior to the day of the primary or election[: Provided, however, That if,]. If, for any reason, it is impossible to deliver [such] the packages to the judge of election in any district, [such] the packages may be delivered to one of the inspectors [therein] or the judges or inspectors may pick up the materials. The respective judges of election or inspectors shall, [on delivery to them of such packages,] upon delivery, return receipts [therefor] to the county board[, which]. The board shall keep a record of the time [when and the] and manner in which the [several] packages are delivered. [The county board may, in its discretion, require the respective judges of election to call at its office to obtain the said packages.]Section 1205. Time for Opening and Closing Polls.--At all primaries and elections the polls shall be opened at 7 A.M.[, Eastern Standard Time,] local time and shall remain open continuously until 8 P.M.[, Eastern Standard Time] local time, at which time they shall be closed.Section 1209. Opening of Polls; Posting Cards of Instruction and Notices of Penalties and Voters' Rights; Examination of Voting Machines.--(a) [In districts in which ballots are used, the election officers shall, after taking the oath, open the ballot boxes which have been furnished to them, and burn and totally destroy all the ballots and other papers which they may find therein, before the opening of the polls.20250HB1217PN1365 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Whenever during any emergency, it becomes necessary to save waste paper on account of a shortage thereof, the Governor of the Commonwealth may, by proclamation, suspend the foregoing provisions relating to the destruction of ballots and papers, and in that case, the election board shall set the ballots and other papers aside and they shall be collected and disposed of by such means and in such manner as may be determined by the county election board.] When the polling place is opened, the ballot box shall be securely locked[,] and shall not be opened until the close of the polls, as provided in section 1221. At the opening of the polls the seals of the packages furnished by the county board shall be publicly broken[, and the said packages] and the packages shall be opened by the judge of election. The cards of instruction and notices of penalties shall be immediately posted in each voting compartment, and not less than three [such] cards and notices of penalties and voters' rights[,] and not less than five [specimen] sample ballots (at primaries five of each party)[,] shall be immediately posted in or about the voting room outside the enclosed space[, and such cards]. Cards of instruction, notices of penalties and [specimen] sample ballots shall be given to any elector [at his request, so long as there are any on hand.] upon request if the cards or sample ballots are available.* * *Section 1210. Manner of Applying to Vote; Persons Entitled to Vote; Voter's Certificates; Entries to Be Made in District Register; Numbered Lists of Voters; Challenges.--* * *(a.3) * * *(4) As each voter is found to be qualified and votes, the election officer in charge of the district register shall [write 20250HB1217PN1365 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or stamp] record the date of the election or primary, his number in the order of admission to the voting machines, and at primaries a letter or abbreviation designating the party in whose primary he votes, and shall sign [his name or initials in the proper space on the registration card of such voter contained in the district register.] electronically.* * *Section 1218. Assistance in Voting.--(a) [No voter shall be permitted to] (1) Voters may not receive any assistance in voting at any primary or election, unless [there is recorded upon his registration card his declaration], upon arriving to vote, the voter signs an affidavit that, by reason of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write, [he is] the voter:(i) is unable to read the names on the ballot or on the voting machine labels[, or that he] or;(ii) has a physical disability which renders [him] the voter unable to see or mark the ballot or operate the voting machine[,] or to enter the voting compartment or voting machine booth without assistance.[, the exact nature of such condition being recorded on such registration card, and unless the election officers are satisfied that he still suffers from the same condition.](2) Election officers must be satisfied that the voter suffers from the same condition in the affidavit in order to receive assistance under paragraph (1).(3) If the voter is blind or has impaired vision, an election officer shall read the affidavit to the voter and provide assistance in completion of the affidavit.* * *20250HB1217PN1365 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1231. Deadline for Receipt of Valid Voter Registration Application.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (b), each commission, commissioner and registrar or clerk appointed by the commission shall receive, during ordinary business hours and during additional hours as the commission prescribes, at the office of the commission and at additional places as the commission designates, applications from individuals who apply to be registered to vote as provided under 25 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to voter registration) who appear and claim that they are entitled to be registered as electors of a municipality. A commission may not accept the registration application of an individual until after the commission has confirmed the individual's eligibility to register to vote under Article VII-A.(b) In the administration of voter registration, each commission shall ensure that an applicant who is a qualified elector is registered to vote in an election when the applicant has met any of the following conditions:(1) In the case of voter registration with a motor vehicle driver's license application under [25 Pa.C.S. § 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application)] section 723-A, if the valid voter registration application is received by the appropriate commission not later than [fifteen] thirty days before the election.* * *(3) In the case of voter registration at a voter registration agency under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1325 (relating to government agencies), if the valid voter registration application is received by the appropriate commission not later than [fifteen] thirty days before the election.20250HB1217PN1365 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) In any other case, if the valid voter registration application of the applicant is received by the appropriate commission not later than [fifteen] thirty days before the election.* * *Section 19. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1234. Prohibitions.--The Department of State, a county or a municipality may not permit the following to be established or offered at any election in this Commonwealth:(1) Except as provided under section 1201.5, a polling place at which electors may vote without leaving their vehicles.(2) The mailing of any ballot to an elector who has not requested one for that election under the provisions of this act.(3) The determination of the result of an election through any method of ranked choice voting or a means by which electors may cast any number of votes for candidates for an office greater than the number of positions available for that office.(4) The entering of any interstate compact relating to the determination of the recipient of the Commonwealth's delegation in the electoral college.(5) The registration of any eligible voter who has not submitted a valid application for registration to vote.Section 20. Sections 1302(b), (i)(2) and (k), 1302.1(a) and (a.3)(1) and (2) and 1305(b) of the act are amended to read:Section 1302. Applications for Official Absentee Ballots.--* * *(b) The following shall apply:(1) An application for a qualified elector under subsection (a) shall contain the following information[:], without which 20250HB1217PN1365 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the application shall be rejected:(i) Home residence at the time of entrance into actual military service or Federal employment, [length of time a citizen, length of residence in Pennsylvania, date] if applicable.(ii) Date of birth.[, length of time a resident of voting district, voting district if known, party](iii) Party choice in case of primary[, name and, for a military].(iv) Name.(v) For a military elector, his stateside military address, FPO or APO number and serial number.(vi) At least two of the following:(A) Last four digits of the elector's Social Security number.(B) If the elector has a Pennsylvania driver's license, the license number.(C) The elector's voter registration number.(1.1) A qualified elector's application shall contain the following, but the application shall not be rejected if the information is unknown or not provided:(i) Voting district.(ii) Length of time a resident of voting district.(iii) Length of time a citizen.(iv) Length of residence in this Commonwealth.(2) Any elector other than a military elector shall in addition specify the nature of his employment, the address to which ballot is to be sent, relationship where necessary, and such other information as may be determined and prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.20250HB1217PN1365 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) When such application is received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth it shall be forwarded to the proper county board of election.* * *(i) * * *(2) Nothing in this act shall prohibit a private organization or individual from printing blank voter applications for absentee ballots or shall prohibit the use of such applications by another individual, provided the form, content and paper quality have been approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. Voter applications for absentee ballots distributed under this section must clearly indicate that they have not been sent or distributed by a county or by the department and must be blank upon distribution to any elector.* * *(k) The Secretary of the Commonwealth [may] shall develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for an absentee ballot and request permanent absentee voter status under subsection (e.1), provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant. A county board of elections shall treat any application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (a.3), applications for absentee ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than fifty (50) days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to its operational 20250HB1217PN1365 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 needs, any applications for absentee ballots received more than fifty (50) days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for absentee ballots shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of any primary or election.(a.3) (1) The following categories of electors may apply for an absentee ballot under this subsection, if otherwise qualified:(i) An elector whose physical disability or illness prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election.(ii) An elector who, because of the elector's business, duties or occupation, was unable to apply for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election.(iii) An elector who becomes so physically disabled or ill after five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election that the elector is unable to appear at the polling place on the day of the primary or election.(iv) An elector who, because of the conduct of the elector's business, duties or occupation, will necessarily be absent from the elector's municipality of residence on the day of the primary or election, which fact was not and could not reasonably be known to the elector on or before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election.(2) An elector described in paragraph (1) may submit an 20250HB1217PN1365 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application for an absentee ballot at any time up until the time of the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election. The application shall include a declaration describing the circumstances that prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election or that prevent the elector from appearing at the polling place on the day of the primary or election, and the elector's qualifications under paragraph (1). The declaration shall be made subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).* * *Section 1305. Delivering or Mailing Ballots.--* * *(b) (1) The county board of elections upon receipt and approval of an application filed by any elector qualified in accordance with the provisions of section 1301, subsections (i) to (l), inclusive, shall commence to deliver or mail official absentee ballots [as soon as a ballot is certified and the ballots are available] on the day after the deadline for registering to vote in any election. While any proceeding is pending in a Federal or State court which would affect the contents of any ballot, the county board of elections may await a resolution of that proceeding but in any event, shall commence to deliver or mail official absentee ballots not later than the second Tuesday prior to the primary or election. For those applicants whose proof of identification was not provided with the application or could not be verified by the board, the board shall send the notice required under section 1302.2(d) with the absentee ballot. As additional applications are received and 20250HB1217PN1365 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved after the time that the county board of elections begins delivering or mailing official absentee and mail-in ballots, the board shall deliver or mail official absentee ballots to such additional electors within forty-eight hours.[(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act and notwithstanding the inclusion of a mailing address on an absentee or mail-in ballot application, a voter who presents the voter's own application for an absentee or mail-in ballot within the office of the county board of elections during regular business hours may request to receive the voter's absentee or mail-in ballot while the voter is at the office. This request may be made orally or in writing. Upon presentation of the application and the making of the request and upon approval under sections 1302.2 and 1302.2-D, the county board of elections shall promptly present the voter with the voter's absentee or mail-in ballot. If a voter presents the voter's application within the county board of elections' office in accordance with this section, a county board of elections may not deny the voter's request to have the ballot presented to the voter while the voter is at the office unless there is a bona fide objection to the absentee or mail-in ballot application.](2) A county board of elections shall investigate the circumstances of any absentee ballot returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service. The investigation shall include contacting the absentee elector, further attempts to have the absentee ballot delivered and the correction or reconsideration of the absentee elector's registration status and registered address, if these are found to be incorrect.(3) If a qualified absentee elector directs the qualified elector's ballot to be mailed to an address other than the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified elector's registered address, a county board of elections shall additionally mail a notice of the request to the qualified elector's registered address.* * *Section 21. Section 1306(a) introductory paragraph of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), at any time after receiving an official absentee ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. [Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.]* * *(a.1) The elector shall, prior to eight o'clock P.M. on election day, return his or her completed absentee ballot by one of the following methods only:(1) Delivery through the United States Postal Service to the offices of his or her county board of elections.20250HB1217PN1365 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Delivery in person to the permanent offices of his or her county board of elections during its regular hours of operation.(3) Delivery to a ballot return location established under the following conditions:(i) A ballot return location may only be operated during the hours of seven o'clock A.M. to eight o'clock P.M. during the seven days prior to an election.(ii) Ballot return locations may be established by a county board of elections as necessary. The following shall apply:(A) A county shall maintain at least one ballot return location and may maintain an additional ballot return location for each 100,000 residents of that county as of the most recent census. The county board of election office may serve as a ballot return location.(B) Ballot return locations must be monitored by at least one inspector of elections from each of the two parties with the highest number of registered electors in this Commonwealth. If two such inspectors of elections are unavailable to appear at a ballot return location on any particular day, a county shall not operate the ballot return location. Each inspector of elections shall receive the same compensation provided for an election under this act for each day on which he monitors a ballot return location.(C) The inspectors of election monitoring a ballot return location shall verify the identification of each individual returning a ballot consistent with the provisions of this act. The inspectors of election shall also review each ballot prior to the ballot's return to ensure completeness of the declaration of the elector, signature and date. If, upon inspection and 20250HB1217PN1365 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 review of a ballot being returned, either inspector of election believes the ballot or its method of return to be in violation of any provision of this act, the ballot shall be secured separately from all other ballots at the ballot return location, and the inspectors of election shall record the date, time, identity of the elector and a record of each ballot being returned in potential violation of this act. The county board of elections shall determine whether the ballots are in violation of any provision of this act and, only if the county board of elections is satisfied that a ballot is not in violation, shall direct the ballot to be pre-canvassed or canvassed.(D) Ballot return locations must be monitored by video recording during each hour of operation. The recording must be made available for public inspection and retained for a period of two (2) years.(E) Ballots returned to a location established under this section must be promptly collected and secured each evening after eight o'clock P.M., or immediately upon being closed for the day, whichever is earlier.(F) Each ballot return location intended to be established in an election must be published under section 106 at least thirty (30) days prior to establishment.(G) Each ballot return location must be considered a polling place for the requirements of this act, including accessibility, access of observers and restriction of political activity.(H) Ballot return locations must be established at a fixed location for the duration of the seven (7) days prior to an election.(I) Ballot return locations must be evenly distributed throughout a county to ensure equal access of voters.20250HB1217PN1365 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) After the establishment of in-person early voting under Article XIII-F, ballot return locations may only be established at the same premises as early voting locations in a county.(K) No reimbursement shall be provided by the department or the State Treasury for the costs that a county incurs in operating ballot return locations.(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an elector from returning the completed ballot of another member of his household, registered at the same residential address and unit number. At any time that an elector appears with the intent of returning more than one completed ballot, the inspectors of election shall review the ballots for compliance with this subsection.* * *Section 22. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1306.2. Supervised Voting by Qualified Absentee Electors in Certain Facilities.--(a) The county board of elections shall provide supervised voting for absent electors residing in an assisted living facility or nursing home facility within that county at the request of an administrator of the facility. The request for supervised voting in the facility shall be made by submitting a written request to the board of elections no later than twenty-one (21) days prior to the election for which that request is submitted. The request shall specify the name and address of the facility and the name of electors who wish to vote absentee in that election. If the request contains the names of fewer than five voters, the board of elections is not required to provide supervised voting.(b) The county board of elections may, in the absence of a request from the administrator of a facility, provide for 20250HB1217PN1365 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supervised voting in the facility for persons who have requested an absentee ballot. The county board of elections shall notify the administrator of a facility that supervised voting will occur.(c) The county board of elections shall, in cooperation with the administrator of a facility, select a date and time when the supervised voting will occur.(d) The county board of elections shall designate supervised voting teams to provide services prescribed by this section. Each supervised voting team shall include at least two persons. Each supervised voting team must include representatives of at least the two parties with the largest number of registered electors in this Commonwealth, except that, in a primary election to nominate party nominees in which only one party has candidates appearing on the ballot, each supervised voting team may be of only members of that party. Supervised voting teams shall not be required to be employed by a county and may be volunteers from each party, except that a candidate may not provide supervised voting services.(e) The supervised voting team shall deliver the ballots to the respective absentee electors and each member of the team shall jointly supervise the voting of the ballots. If an elector requests assistance in voting, the oath prescribed under this act shall be completed and the elector may receive the assistance of two members of the supervised voting team or some other person of the elector's choice to assist the elector in casting the elector's ballot.(f) Before providing assistance, the supervised voting team shall disclose to the elector that the ballot may be retained to vote at a later time and that the elector has the right to seek 20250HB1217PN1365 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assistance in voting from some other person of the elector's choice without the presence of the supervised voting team.(g) If an elector declines to vote a ballot or is unable to vote a ballot, the supervised voting team shall mark the ballot "refused to vote" or "unable to vote."(h) After the ballots have been voted or marked in accordance with the provisions of this section, the supervised voting team shall deliver the ballots to the county board of elections.(i) The department shall provide training and information to assisted living facilities and nursing home facilities in order to assist residents in voting, including applicable laws regarding assistance in voting and penalties for violation of election laws.Section 23. Sections 1308(g)(1.1), (2) and (3), 1302-D(b) and (g), 1302.1-D(a) and 1305-D of the act are amended to read:Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--* * *(g) * * *(1.1) The county board of elections shall meet [no earlier than seven o'clock A.M. on] at least twice prior to election day to pre-canvass all ballots received prior to the meeting. Meetings to pre-canvass ballots may occur only between seven o'clock A.M. and eleven o'clock P.M. on the five days prior to election day and while polls are open on election day . A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a pre-canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice of a pre-canvass meeting on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election, one authorized representative of the county 20250HB1217PN1365 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chairperson of each political party and one representative [from] of each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are pre-canvassed. Authorized representatives shall be provided with meaningful access to view and observe the entire process of pre-canvassing or canvassing activities. Such access shall allow all authorized representatives to easily read the text on any ballot or envelope at any point in the process of pre-canvassing or canvassing activities. A county board of elections must designate an official to respond to issues reported by authorized representatives. The department shall establish a procedure for authorized representatives to report any concerns arising from any pre-canvass meeting and the department must investigate and report on any concerns raised in each election. A county board of elections shall record the pre-canvassing and canvassing meetings with audio and visual recording. The entire recording under this section shall be made available only after the close of the polls. No person observing, attending or participating in a pre-canvass meeting may disclose the results of any portion of any pre-canvass meeting prior to the close of the polls.(2) The county board of elections shall meet [no earlier than] immediately upon the close of polls on the day of the election [and no later than the third day following the election] to begin canvassing absentee ballots and mail-in ballots not included in the pre-canvass meeting. The meeting under this paragraph shall continue until all absentee ballots and mail-in ballots received prior to the close of the polls have been canvassed. The county board of elections shall not record or publish any votes reflected on the ballots prior to 20250HB1217PN1365 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the close of the polls. The canvass process shall continue through the eighth day following the election for valid military-overseas ballots timely received under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot). A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are canvassed.(3) When the county board of elections meets to pre-canvass or canvass absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under paragraphs (1), (1.1) and (2), the board shall [examine] do all of the following:(i) Examine the declaration on the envelope of each ballot not set aside under subsection (d) and shall compare the information and signature thereon with that contained in the "Registered Absentee and Mail-in Voters File," the absentee voters' list and/or the "Military Veterans and Emergency Civilians Absentee Voters File," whichever is applicable.(ii) A county board of elections shall use an automated sorting or extracting machine to assist in its processing of absentee ballots and mail-in ballots, the machine must possess capabilities as a signature verification device, and the capabilities must additionally be used by the county board of elections to assist in comparing the signature on each ballot with the signature in a voter's file.(iii) If the county board of elections has verified the proof of identification as required under this act and is satisfied that the declaration is sufficient [and], that the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information contained in the "Registered Absentee and Mail-in Voters File," the absentee voters' list and/or the "Military Veterans and Emergency Civilians Absentee Voters File" verifies his right to vote[,] and that the signature on the ballot matches the signature on file, the county board of elections shall provide a list of the names of electors whose absentee ballots or mail-in ballots are to be pre-canvassed or canvassed.(iv) For absentee ballots or mail-in ballots which the county board of elections is not satisfied that proof of identification has been provided due to an inability to match the signature present on the ballot to the signature on file, or for a ballot on which the declaration of the elector is incomplete, or are unsigned or undated, the county board shall: (A) Attempt to notify the elector by mail, email, telephone or text message that the elector's ballot is incomplete and will not be counted unless action is taken by the elector prior to the closing of polls on election day.(B) Direct the elector to appear before the county board of elections to complete the missing information or to provide an electronic, facsimile or paper copy to the county board of elections, including:(I) proof of identification and an executed affirmation attesting, under penalty of perjury, that the elector is the same individual who personally remitted the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot; or(II) an executed affirmation attesting, under penalty of perjury, that the elector is the same individual who personally remitted the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot and that the elector is indigent and unable to obtain proof of identification without the payment of a fee.20250HB1217PN1365 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) For absentee ballots or mail-in ballots with incurable errors, including lacking a secrecy envelope, or the marking of identifying information on the secrecy envelope, the county board shall:(A) attempt to notify the elector by mail, email, telephone or text message that the elector's ballot cannot be counted due to an incurable error; and(B) direct the elector to vote on election day using a provisional ballot; or(C) if the elector is unable to appear at his or her polling place on election day due to a reason listed under section 1301, direct the elector to apply for an emergency absentee ballot.* * *Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.* * *(b) Content.--The following shall apply:(1) The qualified elector's application shall contain the following information, without which the application shall be rejected:(i) Date of birth.[(ii) Length of time a resident of voting district.(iii) Voting district, if known.](iv) Party choice in case of primary.(v) Name.(vi) At least two of the following:(A) Last four digits of the elector's Social Security number.(B) If the elector has a Pennsylvania driver's license, the license number.(C) The elector's voter registration number.20250HB1217PN1365 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1.1) The qualified elector's application shall contain the following, but the application shall not be rejected if this information is unknown or not provided:(i) Voting district.(ii) Length of time a resident of voting district.(2) A qualified elector shall, in addition, [specify the address to which the ballot is to be sent, the relationship where necessary and other information as may be determined by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.] specify his or her registered address, or the mailing address associated with his or her voter registration record, to which the ballot must be delivered by mail.(3) When an application is received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth it shall be forwarded to the proper county board of election.* * *(g) Permanent mail-in voting list.--[(1) Any qualified registered elector may request to be placed on a permanent mail-in ballot list file at any time during the calendar year. A mail-in ballot application shall be mailed to every person otherwise eligible to receive a mail-in ballot application by the first Monday in February each year or within 48 hours of receipt of the request, whichever is later, so long as the person does not lose the person's voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. A mail-in ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special 20250HB1217PN1365 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year.](1) Neither the department nor the county shall maintain a permanent mail-in voting list. A qualified elector must separately request a mail-in ballot for each election in which the qualified elector chooses to vote by mail, including for each election held within the same calendar year.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for a mail-in ballot [and request permanent mail-in voter status] under this section, provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant. A county board of elections shall treat an application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.[(3) The transfer of a qualified registered elector on a permanent mail-in voting list from one county to another county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.]Section 1302.1-D. Date of application for mail-in ballot.(a) General rule.--Applications for mail-in ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than 50 days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to the county board of elections' operational needs, any applications for mail-in ballots received more than 50 days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for mail-in ballots shall be processed if 20250HB1217PN1365 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 1305-D. Delivering or mailing ballots.(a) Duty of county board of elections.--The county board of elections, upon receipt and approval of an application filed by a qualified elector under section 1301-D, shall commence to deliver or mail official mail-in ballots [as soon as a ballot is certified and the ballots are available] on the day after the deadline for registering to vote in an election. While any proceeding is pending in a Federal or State court which would affect the contents of any ballot, the county board of elections may await a resolution of that proceeding but in any event, shall commence to deliver or mail official mail-in ballots not later than the second Tuesday prior to the primary or election. For applicants whose proof of identification was not provided with the application or could not be verified by the board, the board shall send the notice required under section 1302.2-D(c) with the mail-in ballot. As additional applications are received and approved, the board shall deliver or mail official mail-in ballots to the additional electors within 48 hours.(b) Investigation by the county board of elections.--The county board of elections shall investigate the circumstances of any mail-in ballot returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service. The investigation shall include contacting the mail-in elector, further attempts to have his ballot delivered, and the correction or reconsideration of his registration status and registered address, if these are found to be incorrect.Section 24. Section 1306-D(a) of the act is amended and the 20250HB1217PN1365 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. [Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.]* * *(a.2) Return of completed mail-in ballots.--The elector shall, prior to eight o'clock P.M. on election day, return his or her completed mail-in ballot by one of the following methods only:(1) Delivery through the United States Postal Service to the offices of his county board of elections.(2) Delivery in person to the permanent offices of his or her county board of elections during its regular hours of operation.(3) Delivery to a ballot return location established under the following conditions:20250HB1217PN1365 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A ballot return location may only be operated during the hours of seven o'clock A.M. to eight o'clock P.M. during the seven days prior to an election.(ii) Ballot return locations may be established by a county board of elections as necessary, provided that:(A) A county shall maintain at least one ballot return location and may maintain an additional ballot return location for each 100,000 residents of that county as of the most recent census. A county board of election office may serve as a ballot return location.(B) Ballot return locations must be monitored by at least one inspector of elections from each of the two parties with the highest number of registered electors in this Commonwealth. If two such inspectors of elections are unavailable to appear at a ballot return location on any particular day, a county shall not operate the ballot return location. Each inspector of elections shall receive the same compensation provided for an election under this act for each day on which he monitors a ballot return location.(C) The inspectors of election monitoring any ballot return location shall verify the identification of each individual returning a ballot consistent with the provisions of this act. The inspectors of election shall also ensure review of each ballot prior to the ballot's return to ensure completeness of the declaration of the elector, signature and date. If, upon inspection and review of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a ballot being returned, either inspector of election believes the ballot or its method of return to be in violation of any provision of this act, the ballot shall be secured separately from all other ballots at the ballot return location, and the inspectors of election shall record the date, time, identity of the elector and a record of each ballot being returned in potential violation of this act. The county board of elections shall determine whether the ballots are in violation of any provision of this act and, only if the county board of elections is satisfied that a ballot is not in violation, shall direct the ballot to be pre-canvassed or canvassed.(D) Ballot return locations must be monitored by video recording during each hour of operation. The recording shall be made available for public inspection and retained for a period of two years.(E) Ballots returned to a location established under this section must be promptly collected and secured each evening after eight o'clock P.M., or immediately upon being closed for the day, whichever is earlier.(F) Each ballot return location must be considered a polling place for all requirements of this act, including accessibility, access of observers and restriction of political activity.(G) Ballot return locations must be established at a fixed location for the duration of the seven days prior to an election.(H) Ballot return locations must be evenly 20250HB1217PN1365 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributed throughout a county to ensure equal access of voters.(I) After the establishment of in-person early voting under Article XIII-F, ballot return locations may only be established at the same premises as early voting locations in a county.(J) No reimbursement shall be provided by the Department of State for the costs that a county incurs in operating ballot return locations.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an elector from returning the completed ballot of another member of his or her household, registered at the same residential address and unit number. At any time that an elector appears with the intent of returning more than one completed ballot, the inspectors of election shall review the ballots for compliance with this subsection.* * *Section 25. Section 1302-E(c)(4) of the act is amended by adding a subparagraph and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1302-E. Pennsylvania Election Law Advisory Board.* * *(c) Duties.--The board shall have the following duties:* * *(4) Evaluate and make recommendations on:* * *(iii) The rules prescribed in the official instructions and procedures manual under this section shall include regulations and restrictions governing any vendors contracted by counties or the Department of State 20250HB1217PN1365 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the printing or mailing of ballots.* * *(6) To establish a working group with directors of elections from a minimum of 10 counties, and together , to prescribe rules to achieve and maintain the maximum degree of correctness, impartiality, uniformity and efficiency on the procedures for early voting and voting and of producing, distributing, collecting, counting, tabulating and storing ballots. The board shall also adopt rules regarding transmittal of unvoted ballots, ballot requests, voted ballots and other election materials to and from a qualified absentee military or overseas elector, as defined under 52 U.S.C. § 20310 (relating to definitions) . The following shall apply:(i) The rules shall be prescribed in an official instructions and procedures manual to be issued not later than December 31 of each odd-numbered year immediately preceding the general election. Before its issuance, the manual shall be submitted to the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives and the Governor not later than October 1 of the year before each general election.(ii) Each rule included in the official instructions and procedures manual must provide citations to relevant provisions of this act.20250HB1217PN1365 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) To establish standards for annual training requirements for all county election officials, poll workers, election observers, judges of elections and election integrity officers. Training to fulfill the requirements must be conducted by the Department of State and must be made available on all business days.(8) To adopt rules prescribing minimum standards for nonpartisan voter education. The standards shall, at a minimum, address:(i) voter registration;(ii) balloting procedures, by mail and polling place;(iii) voter rights and responsibilities;(iv) distribution of sample ballots; and(v) public service announcements.(9) To receive reports from county boards of elections required under section 302, to reexamine the rules adopted under paragraph (8), and to use the findings in the reports as a basis for modifying the rules to incorporate successful voter education programs and techniques, as necessary.* * *Section 26. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-FEARLY VOTING BY QUALIFIED ELECTORSSection 1301-F. In-person early voting.Beginning with the 2025 primary election, and for each election thereafter, each county board of elections must provide electors with the opportunity to vote at an early voting center, prior to election day.Section 1302-F. Operation.20250HB1217PN1365 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Early voting centers.--(1) Each early voting center shall be considered a polling place for the purposes of this act.(2) Early voting centers shall be established beginning on the second Friday prior to an election and ending on the first Wednesday prior to an election. A county shall operate at least one early voting center, with an additional early voting center for each 100,000 residents of the county at the time of the most recent census, except that no county shall be required to operate more than five early voting centers.(3) Early voting centers shall be open from 7 A.M to 8 P.M. each day.(4) The board shall provide at least 30 days' notice prior to the establishment of any early voting center, including location and intended hours of operation. The notice under this paragraph shall be published under section 106.(5) Early voting centers may be established only at a permanent building which provides the security required under paragraph (10), and which is a public library facility, public or private school, college or university building, courthouse or a municipal, county or Commonwealth owned building.(6) Early voting centers shall be established at locations distributed throughout the county so as to ensure equal access to all voters.(7) An early voting center shall utilize electronic poll books with the capability of scanning an elector's identification and printing the appropriate ballot for that elector.20250HB1217PN1365 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Each early voting center must be accessible under the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities).(9) Voting at early voting centers shall be conducted using the same type of voting machines utilized by that county on election day.(10) An early voting center shall be continually secured, monitored by staff and monitored by video recording from the beginning of the period provided for early voting until the end, including overnight. Video recording shall be retained and made available publicly.(b) Duty of county board of elections.--During any early voting period, each county board of elections shall make available the total number of electors having cast a ballot at each early voting location during the previous day. Each county board shall prepare an electronic data file listing the individual electors who cast a ballot during the early voting period. This information shall be updated and made available no later than noon of each day and shall be provided to the public upon request.Section 1303-F. Reimbursement.Counties shall be reimbursed by the department for half of the costs incurred in the operation of early voting centers.Section 27. Section 1402 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1402. Returns to Be Open to Public Inspection; Exceptions.--* * *(a.1) Each ballot cast in an election shall be open to public inspection at the office of the county board as soon as practicable after an election, and for as long as the ballots 20250HB1217PN1365 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are required to be retained under this act. Public inspection shall be monitored to ensure the safety and integrity of each ballot and shall be subject to the following:(1) A county official and sheriff shall be present during a public inspection of ballots.(2) A ballot may not be altered, damaged, moved or destroyed in the course of a public inspection.(3) For the 2025 primary election, and for each election thereafter, digital copies of each ballot shall be created, retained and provided upon request, subject to the same conditions as physical ballots.* * *Section 28. Section 1404(f) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1404. Computation of Returns by County Board; Certification; Issuance of Certificates of Election.--* * *(c.1) It shall be the duty of each county board of elections, before certification or the issuance of certificates of election, to record the participation of each elector and the article of this act by which the elector voted, in the voter registration record established in 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 12 Subch. B (relating to Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors (SURE)). If it appears that the total number of ballots cast in an election district, or that the total number of votes returned for a candidate for the same office or nomination at an election exceeds the number of electors recorded as participating in that election in that district, the excess shall be deemed a discrepancy and palpable error, shall be investigated by the return board and no votes shall be recorded from the district 20250HB1217PN1365 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 until an investigation is conducted. The excess shall authorize the following:(1) The summoning of the election officers, overseers, machine inspectors and clerks to appear with any election papers in their possession.(2) The production of the ballot box before the return board, the examination and scrutiny of its contents and of the registration and election documents relating to the district, in the presence of representatives of each party and candidate interested who are attending the canvass of such votes.(3) The recount of the ballots contained in the ballot box, either generally or respecting the particular office, nomination, or question as to which the excess exists, in the discretion of the return board.(4) The correction of the returns in accordance with the result of the recount.(5) In the discretion of the return board, the exclusion of the poll of the district, either as to all offices, candidates, questions and parties, or as to a particular office, candidate, question or party as to which the excess exists, if the ballot box is found to contain more ballots:(i) than there are electors registered or enrolled in the election district;(ii) of one party than there are electors registered or enrolled in the district as members of that party;(iii) than the number of voters who voted at the election; or(iv) of one party than the number of voters of the party who voted at the election.(6) A report of the facts of the case to the district 20250HB1217PN1365 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney where the action appears to be warranted.* * *(f) (1) As the returns from each election district are read, computed and found to be correct or corrected as aforesaid, they shall be recorded on the blanks prepared for the purpose until all the returns from the various election districts which are entitled to be counted shall have been duly recorded, when they shall be added together, announced and attested by the clerks who made and computed the entries respectively and signed by the members of the county board. Returns under this subsection shall be considered unofficial for five (5) days. The county board shall submit the unofficial returns to the Secretary of the Commonwealth [by five o'clock P. M. on the Tuesday following the election.] incrementally and as often as practicable until all returns have been submitted. The submission shall be as directed by the secretary for public office which appears on the ballot in every election district in this Commonwealth or for a ballot question which appears on the ballot in every election district in this Commonwealth.(2) The unofficial returns shall be posted to the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website and to each county board of elections' publicly accessible Internet website. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall establish, for the use of each website displaying unofficial returns, a consistent template and interface which shall provide, in electronic spreadsheet form:(i) The total number of ballots voted in this Commonwealth, in each county and in each voting district.(ii) The total number of ballots voted by electors under each article of this act.20250HB1217PN1365 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The votes recorded for each candidate or question, in each voting district and each county, and the sum for the Commonwealth, including the number of votes received by each candidate or question under each article of this act.(iv) The percentage of voting districts having reported results . (v) The percentage of registered electors who are recorded as having voted in this Commonwealth, each county and each voting district . (vi) The total number of registered electors in this Commonwealth, each county and each voting district . (vii) The total number of mail-in and absentee ballots sent by each county and the sum for this Commonwealth.(viii) The total number of overseas and military ballots mailed.(ix) A website displaying unofficial returns shall provide an interactive map allowing the information under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii) and (viii) to be viewed for each election district, county and this Commonwealth. At any time that unofficial results data previously posted to the Department of State or a county's publicly accessible Internet website is amended, corrected, deleted or updated in a manner other than the inclusion of additional results, the Department of State and an affected county shall post a disclosure to the unofficial returns website explicitly noting the time such update occurred, the reason and the impact on unofficial returns.(3) At the expiration of five (5) days after the completion of the computation of votes, in case no petition for a recount or recanvass has been filed in accordance with the provisions of 20250HB1217PN1365 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act, or upon the completion of the recount or recanvass if a petition therefor has been filed within five (5) days after the completion of the computation of votes, the county board shall certify the returns so computed in said county in the manner required by this act, unless upon appeals taken from any decision, the court of common pleas shall have directed any returns to be revised, or unless in case of a recount, errors in the said returns shall have been found, in which case said returns shall be revised, corrected and certified accordingly. The county board shall thereupon, in the case of elections, issue certificates of election to the successful candidates for all county, city, borough, township, ward, school district, poor district and election offices, and local party offices to be filled by the votes of the electors of said county, or of any part thereof.* * *Section 29. Article XVI-A of the act is repealed:[ARTICLE XVI-AElection Integrity Grant ProgramSection 1601-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Election Integrity Restricted Account established under section 1732-A.2 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Program." The Election Integrity Grant Program established under section 1602-A.20250HB1217PN1365 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1602-A. Funding for elections.(a) Election Integrity Grant Program.--The Election Integrity Grant Program is established within the department to provide grants to counties for the administration of elections.(b) Appropriation.--Money in the account is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes under this article.(c) (Reserved).(d) Application.--The following shall apply:(1) By August 1, 2022, and each August 1 thereafter, the department shall begin accepting applications from counties seeking grant money under this section. The department shall develop a form for a county to certify that the county intends to use grant money for an eligible use under subsection (f).(2) If a county is seeking grants under this section, the county shall apply to the department no later than August 15, 2022, and each August 15 thereafter.(e) Distribution.--Each county shall be entitled to an allotment equal to the total amount appropriated to the program under this section multiplied by the quotient of the county's number of registered voters divided by the total number of registered voters in all counties. For the purposes of this subsection, the department shall use the county's total number of registered voters for the most recent primary election as certified to the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 302(m).(f) Eligible uses.--A county shall use grant money awarded under this section for any of the following purposes:(1) Payment of staff needed to pre-canvass and canvass 20250HB1217PN1365 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mail-in ballots and absentee ballots.(2) Physical security and transparency costs for centralized pre-canvassing and canvassing.(3) Post-election procedures required under this act.(4) List maintenance activities under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(1) and (3) (relating to removal of electors).(5) The printing of ballots.(6) Training costs for district election officials.(7) Payment of staff at polling places on election day.(8) Secure preparation, transportation, storage and management of voting apparatuses, tabulation equipment and required polling place materials.(9) Costs of county board of election duties related to processing of voter registration applications.(g) Payments.--The department shall make payments to counties that applied for a grant under this section no later than September 1, 2022, and each September 1 thereafter.(h) Reporting.--No later than 90 days after the date of each general, municipal and primary election, a county that received a grant under this section shall report to the department, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives, on a form prescribed by the Department of State, how the county used the grant money received under this section.(i) Clawback.--If a county fails to substantially comply with the requirements of this section, the county shall return the grant money received to the department for deposit into the account. If a county fails to return the grant money, the county 20250HB1217PN1365 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be ineligible to receive grants through the program for a period of one year.(j) Grant agreement.--The grant agreement between the department and the county under this section shall include the following requirements for counties:(1) The county shall begin pre-canvassing at 7 a.m. on election day and shall continue without interruption until each mail-in ballot and absentee ballot received by 7 a.m. on election day is pre-canvassed.(2) The county shall begin canvassing mail-in ballots and absentee ballots at 8 p.m. on election day and shall continue without interruption until each ballot has been canvassed.(3) No later than 12:01 a.m. on the day following the election, the county board of elections shall announce and post on its publicly accessible Internet website an unofficial number of absentee ballots and mail-in ballots received for the election.(4) A county shall certify to the department that the county has completed a program under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(1) and mailed notices required under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(3) within the prior 12 months.(5) The outcome of any post-election audit required under this act shall be submitted with the certification to the Secretary of the Commonwealth of the results of the primary or general election under section 302(k) and shall be posted on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1603-A. County report.(a) Report.--No later than 75 days after the effective date 20250HB1217PN1365 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this section, each county board of elections shall conduct an internal review of practices and certify to the Department of State that the county is in compliance with each of the following:(1) Approval of voter registration applications under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1328(a) (relating to approval of registration applications).(2) Cancellation of deceased electors under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1505 (relating to death of registrant).(3) Voter removal programs under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1901(b)(1) and (3) (relating to removal of electors).(4) Safe keeping of voted ballots under sections 1308(a) and 1113-A.(5) Enforcing the voter identification provisions of sections 1302.2(b) and 1302.2-D.(6) Pre-canvassing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under section 1308.(b) Posting.--The certification by each county under subsection (a) shall be posted on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.]Section 30. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1778. Powers and Duties of the Attorney General Relating to Elections.--(a) The Attorney General shall, at least ninety days prior to each primary election, nominate an independent prosecutor for confirmation by the Senate. The independent prosecutor shall review election complaints received by the Department of State and the county boards of elections for elections occurring during that calendar year. The independent prosecutor shall have experience prosecuting election law violations and shall coordinate efforts with each 20250HB1217PN1365 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 level of law enforcement. The independent prosecutor shall publish a report following each election including:(1) The total number of complaints filed and to which entity the complaint was filed.(2) A summary of how each complaint was investigated by the independent prosecutor.(3) Recommendations to the General Assembly, the Department of State and county boards of elections for reducing future complaints.(b) The report under this section shall be a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."Section 1779. Powers and Duties of District Attorneys Relating to Elections.--The district attorney of each county in this Commonwealth, or an appointee, shall serve as a county election integrity officer for elections occurring in that county. In an election year in which a district attorney is a candidate in any election, the district attorney shall appoint an independent prosecutor at least ninety days prior to a primary election to serve as a county election integrity officer for elections occurring during that calendar year.Section 31. Sections 1801, 1802, 1802.1, 1803, 1804, 1805, 1806, 1807, 1808, 1809, 1810, 1811, 1812, 1813, 1814, 1815, 1816, 1817, 1818, 1819, 1820, 1821, 1823, 1824, 1825, 1826, 1827, 1828, 1829, 1830, 1831, 1832, 1833, 1834, 1835, 1836, 1837, 1838, 1839, 1840, 1841, 1843, 1845, 1847, 1848, 1849, 1850 and 1853 of the act are amended to read:Section 1801. Disobeying Lawful Instructions.--Any person who wilfully disobeys any lawful instruction or order of any county board of elections, or who refuses to obey their subpoena 20250HB1217PN1365 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 duly issued and served under the provisions of this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment not exceeding [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1802. Perjury.--Any wilful false statement made under oath or affirmation or in writing, stating that it is so made, although such oath or affirmation may not have actually been made, by any person regarding any material matter or thing relating to any subject being investigated, heard, determined or acted upon by any county board of elections, or member thereof, or by any court or judge thereof, judge of election, inspector of election, or overseer, in accordance with the terms of this act, shall be perjury, a misdemeanor of the first degree, and any person, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [ten thousand ($10,000)] twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [five (5)] ten (10) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1802.1. False Affidavits of Candidates.--Any candidate for State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or school district office or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress or any other elective public office who knowingly makes a false statement regarding his eligibility or qualifications for such office in his candidate's affidavit shall, in litigation which results in the removal of the candidate from the ballot, be liable for court costs, including filing fees, attorney fees, investigation fees and similar costs, in an amount up to [ten thousand 20250HB1217PN1365 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($10,000)] twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars.Section 1803. Refusal to Permit Inspection of Papers; Destruction or Removal; Secretary of the Commonwealth.--Any Secretary of the Commonwealth, deputy, or employe of his office, who shall refuse to permit the public inspection or copying as authorized, except when in use in his office, by this act, of any return, nomination petition, certificate or paper, other petition, account, contract, report or any other document or record in his custody which, under the provisions of this act, is required to be open to public inspection; or who shall destroy or alter, or permit to be destroyed or altered, any such document or record during the period for which the same is required to be kept in his office; or who shall remove any such document or record from his office during said period, or permit the same to be removed, except pursuant to the direction of any competent court or any committee required to determine any contested primary or election, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1804. Refusal to Permit Inspection of Papers; Destruction or Removal; County Boards of Elections.--Any member, chief clerk or other employe of any county board of elections, who shall refuse to permit the public inspection or copying, as authorized by this act, of any general or duplicate return sheet, tally paper, affidavit, nomination petition, certificate or paper, other petition, witness list, account, contract, report or any other document or record in the custody of such 20250HB1217PN1365 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county board which, under the provisions of this act, is required to be open to public inspection; or who shall destroy or alter, or permit to be destroyed or altered, any such document or record during the period for which the same is required to be kept in the office of such county board; or who shall remove any such document or record from the office of such county board during said period, or permit the same to be removed, except pursuant to the direction of any competent court or any committee required to determine any contested primary or election, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1805. Insertion and Alteration of Entries in Documents; Removal; Refusal to Deliver.--Any member, chief clerk or employe of any county board of elections or judge, inspector or clerk of election, machine inspector, overseer, or other person, who knowingly inserts or knowingly permits to be inserted any fictitious name, false figure or other fraudulent entry on or in any registration card, district register, voter's certificate, list of voters, affidavit, tally paper, general or duplicate return sheet, statement, certificate, oath, voucher, account, ballot or other record or document authorized or required to be made, used, signed, returned or preserved for any public purpose in connection with any primary or election; or who materially alters or intentionally destroys any entry which has been lawfully made therein, except by order of the county board of elections or court of competent jurisdiction, or who 20250HB1217PN1365 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 takes or removes any such book, affidavit, return, account, ballot or other document or record from the custody of any person having lawful charge thereof, in order to prevent the same from being used or inspected or copied as required or permitted by this act, or who neglects or refuses, within the time and in the manner required by this act, to deliver the same into the custody of the officers who are required by this act to use or keep the same, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months or more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1806. Refusal to Permit Overseers, Watchers, Attorneys or Candidates to Act.--Any member of a county board of elections, judge of election or inspector of election who shall refuse to permit any overseer or watcher, attorney or candidate to be present, as authorized by this act, at any session of a county board, computation and canvassing of returns of any primary or election, recount of ballots or recanvass of voting machines, as authorized by this act, or at any polling place during the time the polls are open at any primary or election, and after the close of the polls during the time the ballots are counted or voting machine canvassed and until the returns of such primary or election have been made up and signed, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment not exceeding [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.20250HB1217PN1365 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1807. Driving away Watchers, Attorneys, Candidates or Overseers.--Any person who by violence or intimidation shall threaten or drive away any watcher, attorney, candidate or overseer, or representative of the county board of elections, or of the Secretary of the Commonwealth, required or permitted to be present at any polling place, or who shall in any manner prevent any overseer, or representative of the county board of elections or of the Secretary of the Commonwealth from performing his duty under this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1808. Refusal to Permit Election Officers, Clerks and Machine Inspectors to Act; Driving away Said Persons.--Any person, including any election officer, who shall refuse to permit any election officer, clerk or machine inspector, duly elected or appointed and authorized to act, to perform the duties imposed on him or to act as permitted by this act; or who shall by violence or intimidation threaten or drive away, any such election officer, clerk or machine inspector or who shall, in any manner, prevent any such election officer, clerk or machine inspector from performing his rights and duties under this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months or more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.20250HB1217PN1365 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1809. Refusal to Administer Oath; Acting Without Being Sworn.--If any judge of election or minority inspector of election refuses or fails to administer the oath to the officers of election, in the manner required by this act, or if any judge of election, inspector of election, clerk of election, or machine inspector, shall act without being first duly sworn, or if any such person shall sign the written form of oath without being duly sworn, or if any judge of election or minority inspector of election or any other person authorized to administer oaths shall certify that any such person was sworn when he was not, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one hundred ($100)] two hundred ($200) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment not exceeding [six (6) months] one (1) year, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1810. Violation of Oath of Office by Election Officers.--Any judge of election, inspector of election, clerk of election, or machine inspector who shall wilfully violate any of the provisions of his oath of office, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment not exceeding [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1811. Peace Officers; Failure to Render Assistance; Hindering or Delaying County Board Members and Others.--Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, deputy constable, police or other peace officer, who shall fail upon demand of any member of a county board of elections, judge or inspector of election, or overseer to render such aid and assistance to him as he shall 20250HB1217PN1365 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request in the maintenance of peace and in the making of arrests, as herein provided, or who shall wilfully hinder or delay or attempt to hinder or delay any member of a county board, judge or inspector of election, or overseer in the performance of any duty under this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [three (3)] six (6) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1812. Nomination Petitions and Papers; Offenses by Signers.--If any person shall knowingly and wilfully sign any nomination petition or nomination paper, without having the qualifications prescribed by this act, or if any person shall set opposite a signature on a nomination petition or paper, a date other than the actual date such signature was affixed thereto, or if any person shall set opposite the signature on a nomination petition or nomination paper, a false statement of the signer's place of residence or occupation, or if any person shall sign more nomination petitions or nomination papers than permitted by the provisions of this act, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one hundred ($100)] two hundred ($200) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [three (3)] six (6) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, at the discretion of the court.Section 1813. False Signatures and Statements in Nomination Petitions and Papers.--If any person shall knowingly make a false statement in any affidavit required by the provisions of this act, to be appended to or to accompany a nomination 20250HB1217PN1365 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petition or a nomination paper, or if any person shall fraudulently sign any name not his own to any nomination petition or nomination paper, or if any person shall fraudulently alter any nomination petition or nomination paper without the consent of the signers, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1814. Nomination Petitions; Certificates and Papers; Destruction; Fraudulent Filing; Suppression.--Any person who shall falsely make any nomination certificate or who shall wilfully deface or destroy any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper, or any part thereof, or any letter of withdrawal, or who shall file any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper or letter of withdrawal knowing the same, or any part thereof, to be falsely made, or who shall suppress any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper, or any part thereof, which has been duly filed, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1815. Offenses by Printers of Ballots.--Any printer employed by any county board of elections to print any official ballots, or any person engaged in printing the same who shall appropriate to himself or give or deliver or knowingly permit to be taken any of said ballots by any other person than such 20250HB1217PN1365 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county board of election or their duly authorized agent, or who shall wilfully print or cause to be printed any official ballot in any form other than that prescribed by such county board or with any other names or printing, or with the names spelled otherwise than as directed by them or the names or printing thereon arranged in any other way than that authorized and directed by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [six (6) months] one (1) year nor more than [five (5)] ten (10) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1816. Unlawful Possession of Ballots; Counterfeiting Ballots.--Any person other than an officer charged by law with the care of ballots, or a person entrusted by any such officer with the care of the same for a purpose required by law, who shall have in his possession outside the polling place any official ballot, or any person who shall make or have in his possession any counterfeit of an official ballot, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1817. Forging and Destroying Ballots.--Any person who shall forge or falsely make the official endorsement on any ballot or wilfully destroy or deface any ballot or wilfully delay the delivery of any ballots shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand 20250HB1217PN1365 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1818. Tampering with Voting Machines.--Any election officer or other person who shall unlawfully open or who shall tamper with or injure or attempt to injure any voting machine to be used or being used at any primary or election, or who shall prevent or attempt to prevent the correct operation of such machine, or any unauthorized person who shall make or have in his possession a key to a voting machine to be used or being used in any primary or election, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1819. Destroying, Defacing or Removing Notices, Et Cetera.--Any person who shall, prior to any primary or election, wilfully deface, remove or destroy any notice or list of candidates posted in accordance with the provisions of this act, or who, during any primary or election, shall wilfully deface, tear down, remove or destroy any card of instructions, notice of penalties, specimen ballot or diagram printed or posted for the instruction of electors, or who shall, during any primary or election, wilfully remove or destroy any of the supplies or conveniences furnished by the county board of elections to any polling place in order to enable electors to vote, or the election officers to perform their duties, or who shall wilfully hinder the voting of others, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine 20250HB1217PN1365 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not exceeding [one hundred ($100)] two hundred ($200) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [three (3)] six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1820. Police Officers at Polling Places.--Any police officer in commission, whether in uniform or in citizen's clothes, who shall be within one hundred (100) feet of a polling place during the conduct of any primary or election, except in the exercise of his privilege of voting or for the purpose of serving warrants, or in accordance with the provisions of the exception set forth in section 1207 of this act where the police station or headquarters is located in the same building or on the premises where the polling place is located or unless called upon to preserve the peace, as provided by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1821. Peace Officer; Failure to Quell Disturbances at Polls; Hindering or Delaying Election Officers and Others.--Any mayor, chief burgess, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, deputy constable, police officer or other peace officer who shall neglect or refuse to clear an avenue to the door of any polling place which is obstructed in such a way as to prevent electors from approaching, or who shall neglect or refuse to maintain order and quell any disturbance if such arises at any polling place upon the day of any primary or election, when called upon so to do by any election officer or any three qualified electors of the election district, or who shall wilfully hinder or delay, or attempt to hinder or delay, any 20250HB1217PN1365 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judge, inspector or clerk of election, machine inspector or overseer in the performance of any duty under this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor in office, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1823. Election Officers Permitting Unregistered Electors to Vote; Challenges; Refusing to Permit Qualified Electors to Vote.--Any judge or inspector of election who permits any person to vote at any primary or election who is not registered in accordance with law, except a person in actual military service or a person as to whom a court of competent jurisdiction has ordered that he shall be permitted to vote, or who permits any registered elector to vote knowing that such registered elector is not qualified to vote, whether or not such person has been challenged, or who permits any person who has been lawfully challenged to vote at any primary or election without requiring the proof of the right of such person to vote which is required by law, or who refuses to permit any duly registered and qualified elector to vote at any primary or election, with the knowledge that such elector is entitled to vote, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand ($30,000) dollars, and to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both.Section 1824. Election Officers Refusing to Permit Elector to Vote in Proper Party at Primaries.--Any judge, inspector or clerk of election who refuses to permit an elector at any 20250HB1217PN1365 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 primary at which ballots are used to receive the ballot of the party with which he is enrolled, or who gives to any such elector the ballot of any party in which he is not enrolled, or any judge, or inspector of election, or machine inspector who, at any primary at which voting machines are used, adjusts any voting machine about to be used by an elector so as not to permit him to vote for the candidates of the party in which he is enrolled, or so as to permit him to vote for the candidates of any party in which he is not enrolled, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [ten thousand ($10,000)] twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [five (5)] ten (10) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1825. Frauds by Election Officers.--Any judge, inspector or clerk of election or machine inspector who shall be guilty of any wilful fraud in the conduct of his duties at a primary or election, and any person who shall make a false return of the votes cast at any primary or election, or who shall deposit fraudulent ballots in the ballot box or certify as correct a return of ballots in the ballot box which he knows to be fraudulent, or who shall register fraudulent votes upon any voting machine or certify as correct a return of votes cast upon any voting machine which he knows to be fraudulently registered thereon, or who shall make any false entries in the district register, or who shall fail to insert in the voting check list the voter's certificate of any elector actually voting at any primary or election, or who shall fail to record voting information as required herein, or who shall fail to insert in the numbered lists of voters the name of any person actually 20250HB1217PN1365 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voting, or who shall wilfully destroy or alter any ballot, voter's certificate, or registration card contained in any district register, or who shall wilfully tamper with any voting machine, or who shall prepare or insert in the voting check list any false voter's certificates not prepared by or for an elector actually voting at such primary or election, for the purpose of concealing the destruction or removal of any voter's certificate, or for the purpose of concealing the deposit of fraudulent ballots in the ballot box, or the registering of fraudulent votes upon any voting machine or of aiding in the perpetration of any such fraud, or who shall fail to return to the county board of election following any primary or election any keys of a voting machine, ballot box, general or duplicate return sheet, tally paper, oaths of election officers, affidavits of electors and others, record of assisted voters, numbered list of voters, district register, voting check list, unused, spoiled and cancelled ballots, ballots deposited, written or affixed in or upon a voting machine, or any certificate, or any other paper or record required to be returned under the provisions of this act; or who shall conspire with others to commit any of the offenses herein mentioned, or in any manner to prevent a free and fair primary or election, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand ($30,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1826. Prying into Ballots.--Any judge, inspector or clerk of election, or other person, who, before any ballot is 20250HB1217PN1365 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deposited in the ballot box as provided by this act, shall unfold, open or pry into any such ballot, with the intent to discover the manner in which the same has been marked, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1827. Interference with Primaries and Elections; Frauds; Conspiracy.--If any person shall prevent or attempt to prevent any election officers from holding any primary or election, under the provisions of this act, or shall use or threaten any violence to any such officer; or shall interrupt or improperly interfere with him in the execution of his duty; or shall block up or attempt to block up the avenue to the door of any polling place; or shall use or practice any intimidation, threats, force or violence with design to influence unduly or overawe any elector, or to prevent him from voting or restrain his freedom of choice; or shall prepare or present to any election officer a fraudulent voter's certificate not signed in the polling place by the elector whose certificate it purports to be; or shall deposit fraudulent ballots in the ballot box; or shall register fraudulent votes upon any voting machine; or shall tamper with any district register, voting check list, numbered lists of voters, ballot box or voting machine; or shall conspire with others to commit any of the offenses herein mentioned, or in any manner to prevent a free and fair primary or election, he shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand 20250HB1217PN1365 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($30,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1828. Persons Interfering in Other Districts.--Any person who shall on the day of any primary or election visit any polling place at which he is not entitled to vote and at which he is not entitled to be present under any provision of this act, and shall use any intimidation or violence for the purpose of preventing any election officer from performing the duties required of him by this act, or for the purpose of preventing any qualified elector from exercising his right to vote or from exercising his right to challenge any person offering to vote, or for the purpose of influencing the vote of any elector, he shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand ($30,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1829. Assault and Battery at Polls.--Any person who shall unlawfully strike, wound or commit an assault and battery upon the person of any elector at or near the polling place during the time of any primary or election shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [ten thousand ($10,000)] twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [five (5)] ten (10) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1830. Unlawful Assistance in Voting.--Any elector at any primary or election who shall allow his ballot or the face 20250HB1217PN1365 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the voting machine voted by him to be seen by any person with the apparent intention of letting it be known how he is about to vote; or in districts in which ballots are used, shall cast or attempt to cast any other than the official ballot which has been given to him by the proper election officer; or who, without having made the declaration under oath or affirmation required by section 1218 of this act, or when the disability which he declared before any registration commission no longer exists, shall permit another to accompany him into the voting compartment or voting machine booth, or to mark his ballot or prepare the voting machine for voting by him; or who shall mark his ballot or prepare the voting machine for voting while another is unlawfully present in the voting machine compartment or voting machine booth with him; or who shall state falsely to any election officer that because of illiteracy he is unable to read the names on the ballot or ballot labels or that by reason of physical disability he cannot see or mark the ballot or enter the voting compartment without assistance or that he cannot see or operate the voting machine or enter the voting machine booth without assistance; or who shall state, as his reason for requiring assistance, a disability from which he does not suffer; or any person who shall go into the voting compartment or voting machine booth with another while voting or be present therein while another is voting, or mark the ballot of another or prepare the voting machine for voting with another, except in strict accordance with the provisions of this act; or any person who shall interfere with any elector when inside the enclosed space or when marking his ballot, or preparing the voting machine for voting, or who shall endeavor to induce any elector before depositing his ballot to show how he marks or has marked 20250HB1217PN1365 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 his ballot; or any person giving assistance who shall attempt to influence the vote of the elector whom he is assisting or who shall mark a ballot or prepare a voting machine for voting in any other way than that requested by the voter whom he is assisting, or who shall disclose to anyone the contents of any ballot which has been marked or any voting machine which has been prepared for voting with his assistance, except when required to do so in any legal proceeding, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1831. Election Officers Permitting Unlawful Assistance.--Any election officer who shall permit a voter to be accompanied by another into the voting compartment or voting machine booth when the registration card of such person contains no declaration that such person requires assistance, or when such person has not made, under oath or affirmation, the statement required by section 1218 of this act, or when such election officer knows that the disability which the elector declared before any registration commission no longer exists, or who shall permit any person to accompany an elector into the voting compartment or voting machine booth, except as provided by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1832. Failure to Keep and Return Record of Assisted 20250HB1217PN1365 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Voters.--Any judge of election who shall fail to record, as required by section 1218 (c) of this act, the name of each elector who received assistance or who is accompanied by another into the voting compartment or voting machine booth; or who shall insert in the record of assisted voters the name of any elector who does not receive assistance or is not accompanied by another into the voting compartment or voting machine booth; or who shall fail to record the exact disability of any assisted elector which makes the assistance necessary, or shall record in respect of any assisted elector a disability, other than that stated by the elector; or who shall fail to record the name of each person rendering assistance to an elector as prescribed by this act; or who shall knowingly record as the name of such person giving assistance a name which is not the name of such person; or who shall fail or neglect to return the record of assisted voters to the county board of elections as required by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [two (2)] four (4) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1833. Unlawful Voting.--Any person who votes or attempts to vote at any primary or election, knowing that he does not possess all the qualifications of an elector at such primary or election, as set forth in this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [ten thousand ($10,000)] twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [five (5)] ten (10) 20250HB1217PN1365 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1834. Elector Voting Ballot of Wrong Party at Primary.--Any elector who shall wilfully vote at any primary the ballot of a party in which he is not enrolled, in violation of the provisions of this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1835. Repeat Voting at Elections.--If any person shall vote in more than one election district, or otherwise fraudulently vote more than once at the same primary or election, or shall vote a ballot other than the ballot issued to him by the election officers, or shall advise or procure another so to do, he shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand ($30,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1836. Removing Ballots.--Any person removing any ballot from any book of official ballots, except in the manner provided by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1837. Commissioners to Take Soldiers' Votes.--Any 20250HB1217PN1365 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commissioner appointed by or under the provisions of Article XIII of this act who shall knowingly violate his duty or knowingly omit or fail to do his duty thereunder or violate any part of his oath, shall be guilty of perjury, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1838. Fraudulent Voting by Soldiers.--Any person who shall vote or attempt to vote at any election by electors in military service under the provisions of Article XIII of this act, not being qualified to vote at such election, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1839. Bribery at Elections.--Any person who shall, directly or indirectly, give or promise or offer to give any gift or reward in money, goods or other valuable thing to any person, with intent to induce him to vote or refrain from voting for any particular candidate or candidates or for or against any constitutional amendment or other question at any primary or election; or who shall, directly or indirectly, procure for or offer or promise to procure for such person any such gift or reward with the intent aforesaid; or, who with the intent to influence or intimidate such person to give his vote or to refrain from giving his vote for any particular candidate or candidates or for or against any constitutional amendment or other question at any primary or election, shall give to or 20250HB1217PN1365 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obtain for or assist in obtaining for or offer or promise to give to or obtain for or assist in obtaining for such person any office, place, appointment or employment, public or private, or threaten such person with dismissal or discharge from any office, place, appointment or employment, public or private, then held by him, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand ($15,000)] thirty thousand ($30,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1840. Receipts and Disbursements of Primary and Election Expenses by Persons Other Than Candidates and Treasurers.--Any member of a political committee who shall receive or disburse any money or incur any liability for primary or election expenses, except through the treasurer of such political committee, and any person not a candidate or member of a political committee who shall receive or disburse any money or incur any liability for primary or election expenses, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1841. Receipts of Primary and Election Expenses by Unauthorized Persons.--Any person or any political committee who receives money on behalf of any candidate without being authorized to do so under the provisions of section 1623, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand dollars 20250HB1217PN1365 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($5,000)] ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1843. Contributions by Corporations or Unincorporated Associations.--Any corporation or unincorporated association, which shall pay, give or lend or agree to pay, give or lend any money belonging to such corporation or unincorporated association or in its custody or control, in violation of the provisions of section 1633, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [one thousand dollars ($1,000)] two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than [ten thousand dollars ($10,000)] twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). Any director, officer, agent or employe of any corporation or unincorporated association who shall on behalf of such corporation or unincorporated association pay, give or lend or authorize to be paid, given or lent any money belonging to such corporation or unincorporated association or in its custody or control in violation of the provisions of section 1633, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [ten thousand dollars ($10,000)] twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1845. Failure to File Expense Account.--Any candidate or treasurer of a political committee or person acting as such treasurer who shall fail to file an account of primary or election expenses, as required by this act, shall be guilty 20250HB1217PN1365 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand dollars ($5,000)] ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than [one (1) month] two (2) months nor more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1847. Prohibiting Duress and Intimidation of Voters and Interference with the Free Exercise of the Elective Franchise.--Any person or corporation who, directly or indirectly--(a) uses or threatens to use any force, violence or restraint, or inflicts or threatens to inflict any injury, damage, harm or loss, or in any other manner practices intimidation or coercion upon or against any person, in order to induce or compel such person to vote or refrain from voting at any election, or to vote or refrain from voting for or against any particular person, or for or against any question submitted to voters at such election, or to place or cause to be placed or refrain from placing or causing to be placed his name upon a register of voters, or on account of such person having voted or refrained from voting at such election, or having voted or refrained from voting for or against any particular person or persons or for or against any question submitted to voters at such election, or having registered or refrained from registering as a voter; or (b) by abduction, duress or coercion, or any forcible or fraudulent device or contrivance, whatever, impedes, prevents, or otherwise interferes with the free exercise of the elective franchise by any voter, or compels, induces, or prevails upon any voter to give or refrain from giving his vote for or against any particular person at any election; or (c) being an employer, pays his employes the salary 20250HB1217PN1365 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or wages due in "pay envelopes" upon which or in which there is written or printed any political motto, device, statement or argument containing threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of such employes, or within ninety days of any election or primary puts or otherwise exhibits in the establishment or place where his employes are engaged in labor, any handbill or placard containing any threat, notice, or information that if any particular ticket or candidate is elected or defeated work in his place or establishment will cease, in whole or in part, his establishment be closed up, or the wages of his employes reduced, or other threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of his employes, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. Any person or corporation, convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this section, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five thousand ($5,000)] ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or such person or the officers, directors or agents of such corporation responsible for the violation of this section, shall be sentenced to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1848. Failure to Perform Duty.--Any Secretary of the Commonwealth, member of a county board of elections, chief clerk, employe, overseer, judge of election, inspector of election, clerk of election, machine inspector or custodian or deputy custodian of voting machines on whom a duty is laid by this act who shall wilfully neglect or refuse to perform his duty, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one 20250HB1217PN1365 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1849. Hindering or Delaying Performance of Duty.--Any person who intentionally interferes with, hinders or delays or attempts to interfere with, hinder or delay any other person in the performance of any act or duty authorized or imposed by this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred ($500)] one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1850. Violation of Any Provision of Act.--Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this act, for which a penalty is not herein specifically provided, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [one thousand ($1,000)] two thousand ($2,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than [one (1) year] two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1853. Violations of Provisions Relating to Absentee and Mail-in Ballots.--If any person shall sign an application for absentee ballot, mail-in ballot or declaration of elector on the forms prescribed knowing any matter declared therein to be false, or shall vote any ballot other than one properly issued to the person, or vote or attempt to vote more than once in any election for which an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot shall have been issued to the person, or shall disclose results of a pre-canvassing meeting under section 1308(g)(1.1), or shall violate any other provisions of Article XIII or Article XIII-D 20250HB1217PN1365 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this act, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree, and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding [two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)] five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be imprisoned for a term not exceeding [two (2)] four (4) years, or both, at the discretion of the court.If any person who is chief clerk or a member of a board of elections, member of a return board or member of a board of registration commissioners, shall neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties prescribed by Article XIII or Article XIII-D of this act, or shall reveal or divulge any of the details of any ballot cast in accordance with the provisions of Article XIII or Article XIII-D of this act, or shall disclose results of a pre-canvassing meeting under section 1308(g)(1.1), or shall count an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot knowing the same to be contrary to Article XIII or Article XIII-D, or shall reject an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot without reason to believe that the same is contrary to Article XIII or Article XIII-D, or shall permit an elector to cast the elector's ballot other than a provisional ballot at a polling place knowing that there has been issued to the elector an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, the [elector] person shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding [fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000)] thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or be imprisoned for a term not exceeding [seven (7)] fourteen (14) years, or both, at the discretion of the court.Section 32. Section 1855 of the act is repealed:[Section 1855. Violation of Public Funding of Elections.--Any person who violates section 107 shall be guilty of a 20250HB1217PN1365 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 misdemeanor of the second degree and shall, upon conviction thereof, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.]Section 33. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1856. Unlawful Collection of Ballots.--A person who willfully collects or returns absentee or mail-in ballots in violation of this act commits a felony of the third degree and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or be imprisoned for a term not exceeding fourteen (14) years, or both, at the discretion of the court.Section 1857. Prohibiting Duress and Intimidation of Elections Officials.--Any person who directly or indirectly uses or threatens to use any force, violence or restraint, or inflicts or threatens to inflict any injury, damage, harm or loss, or in any other manner practices intimidation or coercion upon or against any election official, administrator, judge of elections or poll worker in the course of their duties in administering an election shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be fined ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, sentenced to undergo an imprisonment of not more than four (4) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 34. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-CMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 1801-C. Reimbursements.The State Treasurer shall reimburse counties for 100% of the cost of issuing registration cards required under section 302(s) 20250HB1217PN1365 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within one year of the effective date of this section.Section 1802-C. Withholding.The State Treasurer shall withhold all reimbursements and election funding provided for under this act from any county which is in violation of this act or for which an audit or recount has identified violations or irregularities in voting until the issue has been successfully resolved as certified by the Auditor General.Section 35. The sum of $3,100,000 is appropriated to the Auditor General for the purpose of establishing and operating a Bureau of Election Audits.Section 36. The provisions of this act are nonseverable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remaining provisions or applications of this act are void.Section 37. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of Article VII-A of the act.(2) 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 13 is repealed.Section 38. This act shall apply to elections held on or after the effective date of this section.Section 39. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1217PN1365 - 185 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223